 We now have rats that are 4 months old and that were previously diabetic.
 The doctor Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and president of the clinical and scientific division of the Canadian Diabetes Association, said the study is still in its early days.
 Like some other specialists, he is sceptical about the cure for diabetes, noting that these findings are of little relevance to people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Nobel Prize in literature Committee of the Swedish Academy, announced publicly during a radio show on Sveriges Radio in Sweden that the committee, unable to contact Bob Dylan directly about the 2016 Nobel Prize in literature, had given up its efforts to contact him.
 Danius said, at this point, we're not doing anything. I've been calling and sending Emails to his closest collaborator, and I've been getting very friendly replies.
 Previously, Ring's Ceo, Jamie Siminoff, commented that the company came about when his doorbell couldn't be heard from his shop in his garage.
 He mounted a wireless Bell, said.
 Siminoff stated that sales increased after his 2013 appearance on an episode of Shark Tank, in which the show's investors rejected the startup's funding.
 Siminoff was featured on the shopping television channel QVC, in late 2017.
 The ring also won a lawsuit against the security company, ADT Corporation.
 Although an experimental vaccine seems to be able to reduce Ebola mortality, to date, no drug has been clearly considered adequate to treat the existing infection.
 A cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, initially looked promising in the area, but formal studies indicated it had less benefit than was hoped for in preventing death.
 ZMapp was used as a control, which means the scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatments in the PALM study.
 The U S . gymnastics team supports the letter from the U S . Olympic Committee and agrees with the absolute necessity of the Olympic family promoting a safe and healthy environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC's statement that the interests of our athletes and clubs, and their sports, can be best served by advancing meaningful change within our organization,
 The United States gymnastics team supports an independent investigation that could shed light on how an abuse of proportion that was reported so bravely by the survivor, Larry Nassar, could happen without anyone noticing, and supports any change that is necessary and appropriate.
 The team of North American gymnasts and the U S . Olympic Committee have the same goal of making gymnastics and any other sport the safest it can be for our athletes to pursue their dreams in a respectful, healthy and positive environment.
 Throughout the nineteen sixty s, Brzezinski worked for John F . Kennedy and his aide, and then for the Lyndon B . Johnson administration.
 During the 1976 elections, he advised Carter on foreign policy, then served as National Security Advisor from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As a member of the NSA, he helped Carter in the conduct of world diplomatic affairs, such as the Camp David Accords in 1978, the normalization of U.S. China relations in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution, which led to the hostage crisis in 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, received nominations in all of the main categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 The other nominations include Best Picture, Director, Cinematography, Costume Design, Editing, Original Score, Production Design, Sound Editing, Sound Mixing, and Original Screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition and City of Stars, received nominations for best original song, and the studio Lionsgate received 26 nominations, the most of any studio.
 On Sunday night, the President of the United States, Donald Trump, in a statement released by the White House press Secretary, announced that American troops would be leaving Syria.
 The announcement came after Trump had a phone call with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also assume the guard of Islamic state members who, as the statement claims, European nations refused to repatriate.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that is already well accepted, but also offers details that are not found with such frequency in fossils, such as colors and the three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists claim that the upper plumage of this animal was chestnut and the lower part was clear or carotene.
 The discovery also gives clues about the evolution of feathers in birds.
 The dinosaurs' feathers, known as rake, do not have a well-developed shaft, but do have other characteristics, such as spines and barbs.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used in flight, but rather to display or regulate temperature.
 The researchers suggested that, although the tail belonged to a young dinosaur, the sample reveals an adult plumage, not a juvenile.
 On Tuesday morning, a car bomb exploded at the headquarters of the police in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and injuring more than twenty others.
 The governor's office said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 The police have informed that they suspect the attacker to be a Daesh militant.
 They discovered that the sun operated with the same basic principles as other stars: the activity of all the stars in the system was determined by their luminosity, their rotation, and nothing else.
 Luminosity and rotation are used in conjunction to define a star's Rossby number, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The lower the Rossby number, the less active the star is in terms of magnetic inversions.
 During his trip, Iwasaki encountered problems on many occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a marriage in Nepal, and was jailed in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates in both the 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz frequency bands.
 This will allow it to be compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g, provided the base station has dual radios.
 The speeds of 802.11n are substantially faster than those of its predecessors, theoretically, with a maximum throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, who is married and has two grown children, did not make a great impression on Miller, to whom the story was related.
 When asked for a comment, Miller said, quote, Mike talks a lot during the hearing . I was preparing, so I wasn't paying much attention to what he was saying.
 We will strive to significantly reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020,
 He did not define a value for the cuts, saying they will be made according to China's economic output.
 Hu encouraged the developing world to avoid the old path of polluting first and cleaning up later.
 He added, however, that they should not be asked to assume obligations that go beyond their stage of development, responsibility, and capacities.
 The Iraq Study Group released its report at 12:00 GMT today.
 He warns that there are no guarantees that any action in Iraq at this point will prevent sectarian war, the rise of violence, or the tendency towards chaos.
 The report begins with a call for an open debate and the formation of a consensus in the United States on Middle East policy.
 The report criticized almost every aspect of the current administration's Iraq policy and insists on an immediate change of direction.
 The first of the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of this year to protect Iraq's borders against hostile intervention and to restore diplomatic relations with its neighbours.
 The current Argentine Senator and first lady, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy for the Presidency yesterday afternoon in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers away from Buenos Aires.
 The lady Kirchner announced her intention to run for President at the Teatro Argentina, the same place she used to start her campaign for the Senate in 2005 as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The debate began with a controversy over spending on relief and reconstruction after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives have humorously dubbed the Bush New Orleans bailout.
 The liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to people with influence in Washington.
 More than 4 million people went to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of people present was so great that it was not possible for all of them to have access to the funeral in St . Peter's square.
 Several large TVs were installed in several places of Rome so that the people could watch the ceremony.
 In many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, especially in Poland, similar arrangements were made, allowing for the accompaniment by a large number of people.
 Historians have criticized former FBI agents for directing resources to easy cases, especially car theft cases, in order to increase the agency's popularity.
 The Congress began funding the initiative in the fiscal year of 2005 and specified that the FBI must dedicate 10 agents to adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa made the highest score of the innings, 70 runs in just 41 balls, hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The middle order batsmen, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, had a good performance and made a century partnership.
 But after failing to hit the captain's target, India only managed to make 36 runs and lost 7 wickets, ending the innings.
 The American President, George W . Bush, arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long visit to the region.
 He was received by Singapore's deputy Prime Minister, Wong Kan Seng, and discussed trade and terrorism with Singapore's Prime Minister, Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of defeats in the interim election, Bush spoke publicly about the expansion of trade in Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee of all parties for review before its second reading, after a 25-minute meeting Tuesday with NDP leader Jack Layton at the PMO.
 Layton requested changes to the Conservative's environmental bill during a meeting with the Prime Minister, asking for a, quote,
 Since the Federal Government intervened to take over the financing of the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state Government and some Federal MPs have not liked this act and have called it a prelude to the Federal election which will be held in November.
 But Prime Minister John Howard said the act was only to protect the hospital's facilities from being redeveloped by the Tasmanian government, giving it 45 million Australian dollars more.
 According to the latest bulletin, sea level readings indicated the emergence of a tsunami.
 No damage or injuries were reported in Tonga, but the island was temporarily without electricity, which prevented local authorities from receiving the tsunami warning sent by the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii located on the coast and in the vicinity were closed throughout the fourth day, although the warnings had been withdrawn.
 The U S . President, George W . Bush, welcomed the announcement.
 Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for Bush, called the North Korean promise an important step towards the goal of achieving verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 The tenth named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical Storm Jerry, formed in the Atlantic Ocean today.
 The National Hurricane Center says at this point, Jerry is not a threat to land.
 The U S . Army Corps of engineers estimated that 15 cm of rain could break the previously damaged dikes.
 The Ala Nove, which saw 6-meter high floods during Hurricane Katrina, is currently at the waist, as the nearest levee is already at the top of its flood stage.
 The water is pouring over the dike in a section 100 feet wide.
 Adam Cuerden, the Commons administrator, expressed his disappointment with the exclusions when he spoke to Wikinews last month.
 He basically lied from the beginning, first by acting as if he were acting for a legal reason,
 The irritation of the community led to the current efforts to create a policy regarding sexual content for the site that hosts millions of openly licensed media files.
 The work done was, for the most part, theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations made by the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect that the team was looking for would be caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter of the Galaxy and the Milky way.
 As the moon exercises a pull on the earth, causing tides, so the Milky way exercises a pull on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 Scientists have been able to conclude that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way that it affects normal matter.
 This theory states that most of the dark matter in the vicinity of a Galaxy is located in the vicinity of a Galaxy in a sort of a halo and is composed of several tiny particles.
 Television reports show the plant spewing out a white, ashy smoke.
 Local officials are warning residents of the nearby plant to stay inside, turn off their air conditioning and not to drink tap water.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency, radioactive calcium and iodine were identified at the plant.
 Authorities believe this indicates that the containers may have been ruptured and are leaking uranium fuel.
 Dr Tony Moll discovered extensively drug resistant Tuberculosis in the KwaZulu-Natal region of South Africa.
 He warned that the new variant is a cause for concern and alarm, given the high rate of mortality.
 According to Dr . Moll, some patients may have contracted the virus in the hospital, and at least two were health care professionals.
 In a one-year period, an infected person can infect between 10 and 15 close contacts.
 However, the percentage of XDR-TB in the total group of people with tuberculosis still appears to be low, 6,000 of a group of 330,000 individuals infected at any one time in South Africa.
 The satellites, both weighing over 1,000 pounds and traveling at approximately 17,500 miles per hour, collided at an altitude of 491 miles.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was intense.
 They're still trying to determine the size of the accident and how the earth will be affected.
 The United States Strategic Command, from the Department of Defense, is tracking the debris.
 The outcome of the graph analysis will be made available on the public Website.
 A Pittsburgh-Based pediatrician will be charged with aggravated murder after her mother was found dead in the trunk of her car on Wednesday, officials in Ohio said.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the side of the road wearing a T-shirt and underwear in what appeared to be a state of severe intoxication.
 She indicated her black Oldsmobile Intrigue to the police at 150 meters away.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, under blankets stained with blood.
 The police said the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease, this season, were notified in late July.
 The disease is transmitted by pigs and then migrates to humans via mosquitoes.
 The outbreak led the Indian government to take certain measures, such as the installation of pig collectors in severely affected areas, the distribution of thousands of mosquito nets, and the spraying of pesticides.
 Millions of encephalitis vaccine also have been promised by the government, which will help to prepare the health agencies for the coming year.
 The plans for the vaccines that would be given to the historically most affected areas this year had a delay because of a lack of funds and a low priority in relation to other diseases.
 In the year 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where he began working for the Swedish Postal Service after three years, and became their main engraver.
 He's produced over 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is of such recognized quality and detail that he is one of the few famous people among philatelists,
 His 1,000th stamp was the magnificent David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl's,
 He also was involved in the engraving of cédulas for many countries, and recent examples of his work included the portraits of the Prime Minister on the new 5 and 100 Canadian dollar bills.
 After the accident, Gibson was moved to a hospital, but he died shortly after.
 The truck driver, who is 64, suffered no injuries in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident at roughly 12 GMT of the same day.
 There were children waiting to cross the street and all of them were screaming and crying,
 They all ran back to the place where the accident had occurred.
 Other items on the agenda in Bali include saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technologies to help developing nations grow in less polluting ways.
 The UN also hopes to complete a fund to help the countries affected by global warming to deal with the impacts.
 The money could go to houses that are flood-proof, to better water management, as well as to the diversification of crops.
 Fluke writes that the attempts of some men to keep women from talking about their health failed.
 She came to this conclusion due to the sheer number of positive comments and incentives sent to her by individuals of both genders, asking that the contraceptive medication be considered a medical necessity.
 When the fighting stopped, after the wounded had been transported to the hospital, about 40 of the other inmates remained in the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to reticulate the situation, but the demands of the inmates were unclear.
 Between 10 p m. and 11 p m. (MDT), the inmates started a fire in the prison.
 Soon, police officers, who had been prepared with anti-riot equipment, entered the yard and encircled the inmates with tear gas.
 The rescue teams managed to put out the fire at 23:35.
 After the dam was built in 1963, the seasonal floods that spread sediment throughout the river stopped.
 This sediment was essential for creating sand banks and beaches, which served as habitat for wildlife.
 Consequently, two species of fish went extinct, and two others are at risk, like the Gila cypha.
 Despite the fact that the water only rises a few meters after the flood, the authorities hope that it will be enough to rescue the banks of sand eroded by the current.
 No tsunami alert was issued and according to the geophysics agency in Jakarta, there will be no need for one,
 Despite the lack of a tsunami threat, residents began to panic and abandon their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey had choked back tears in her farewell, she made it clear to fans that she would return.
 This is not a farewell, it's the closing of one chapter and the opening of a new one.
 The final results of Namibia's presidential and parliamentary elections indicate that the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, was re-elected by a large margin.
 The ruling party, the Organization of the People of South Africa, also won a majority in the parliamentary elections.
 The coalition and Afghan troops headed to the area for protection, and other coalition aircraft were sent to help.
 The accident occurred at a great altitude in the mountainous terrain, and it is believed to have been caused by enemy fire.
 Efforts to search for the crash site are being hampered by bad weather and hostile terrain.
 The medical charities, Médecins Sans Frontières and the World Health Organisation, say it is the worst outbreak the country has seen.
 The spokesman for Medecines Sans Frontiere, Medecines Sans Frontiere, said,
 The games began at 10 a M with good weather and, despite the rain, it was a perfect day for the Rugby 7s.
 The tournament's top seed, South Africa, started off with a bang, winning comfortably by 26 to 0 against the 5th-seeded Zambia.
 Appearing clearly rusty in the game against her Southern sisters, South Africa, however, was improving consistently as the tournament progressed.
 His disciplined defense, his ability to handle the ball and his excellent teamwork made it clear that this was the team to be defeated.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank museum declare that the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a risk to public health, arguing that it was in imminent danger of falling.
 The trial was scheduled for Tuesday, but was suspended after an emergency court ruling.
 All of the cavern entrances, which have been named the Seven Sisters, are at least 100 to 250 meters in diameter.
 Infrared images show that the variations in temperature from night to day indicate that they are probably caves.
 They are colder than the surrounding surface during the day and warmer at night.
 Its thermal behavior is not as stable as the great caverns of the planet, which tend to preserve a well-defined temperature, but it is consistent with the fact that they are deep holes in the ground.
 In France, voting has traditionally been a low-tech experience: voters isolate themselves in a booth and deposit a pre-printed slip of paper indicating the candidate of their choice in an envelope.
 After the officials verify the voter's identity, the voter inserts the envelope into the ballot box and signs the voter's list.
 The French electoral law codifies the procedures in a fairly rigorous way.
 Since 1988, the ballot boxes must be transparent so that voters and observers can witness that no envelope is present at the beginning of the vote and that no envelope is added, with the exception of those of the duly counted and authorized voters.
 Candidates may send representatives to observe all parts of the process, and during the night, votes are counted by volunteers under careful supervision, following specific procedures.
 The Asus Eee PC, recently launched worldwide with improved functionality and aimed at reducing costs, became a much-discussed topic at the 2007 IT Month in Taipei.
 But the consumer notebook market will be radically varied and transformed after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award in 2007 by the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The Website describes the show as a, quote,
 In its early days, the program was exclusively hosted on the long-running TogiNet Radio, a site focused on radio talk.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet established AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary station.
 The previous show featured amateur voice actors who lived in the East Texas area.
 The looting is said to have continued all night, while the police were not seen in the streets of Bishkek.
 The city of Bishkek was described as sinking into a state of anarchy, according to one observer, as mobs of people wandered the streets and looted shops.
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the protesters from the south for the illegality.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks (New Zealand) in a Tri Nations Rugby Union match at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was a one-point victory, 21 to 20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 For the Springboks, it ended a run of five consecutive defeats.
 It was the All Blacks' last game, which they had won two weeks earlier.
 The final of the series will be played at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week when the Springboks play against Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook West Montana at 10:08 p.m. Monday.
 No immediate report of damage was received by the United States Geological Survey or the National earthquake information center.
 The epicenter of the quake was about 20 kilometers northeast of Dillon and about 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 The deadly avian influenza H5N1 strain, which has been confirmed as having infected a dead wild duck found Monday in a pond near Lyon, in the east of France.
 France is the seventh country in the European Union to be hit by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 The suspected H5N1 cases in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for deaths in all places, destruction and terrorization of millions and millions of earth's inhabitants.
 Chambers, who is Agnostic, argues the process is frivolous and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The story presented in the French opera, by Camille Saint-Saëns, is about an artist whose life is dictated by his love of drugs and Japan.
 As a result, the actors smoke marijuana based on the stage, and the theater itself encourages the audience to join them.
 The former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, the Texas governor Rick Perry and the congresswoman Michele Bachmann finished in fourth, fifth and sixth places, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but said harsh words against Romney, whose campaign had aired negative ads in Iowa against Gingrich.
 Perry said he would return to Texas to watch the results of the state party convention that night and determine if there was a path for him to continue in the race, but later said he would remain in the race and participate in the January 21 South Carolina primary.
 Bachmann, who won the Ames Straw Poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was transported to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 According to reports, he was in his early 20s. In a statement, Bieber said, quote,
 The other nominations include Best Picture, Director, Cinematography, Costume Design, Film-Editing, Original Score, Production Design, Sound Editing, Sound Mixing and Original Screenplay.
 According to police, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will be criminally charged.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, a considerable number of countries failed to win any medals.
 They include the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen in ninth place in the standing women's Super-G yesterday, and Finland, with Katja Saarinen in tenth place in the same event.
 Mitchell Gourley, an Australian, finished 11th in the men's Super-G. The Czech competitor, Oldrich Jelinek, finished 16th in the men's Super-G.
 Arly Velasquez, from Mexico, finished in fifteenth place in the men's Super-G. Adam Hall, from New Zealand, finished in ninth place in the men's Super-G.
 The Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished in thirteenth place in the Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers, who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake, are being blamed for spreading the disease, which started near the troops' camp.
 According to the lawsuit, waste from the UN camp was not being treated adequately, which caused bacteria to grow in the River Artibonite, one of the largest in Haiti.
 Before the troops arrived, Haiti had not had a cholera outbreak since 1800.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited independent studies that suggest the UN peacekeeping battalion in Nepal, without realizing it, brought the disease to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN specialist on the disease, said the outbreak was probably caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the Howard University Hospital declared the patient to be in stable condition.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where some cases of the Ebola virus had occurred.
 The hospital has been following the infection control protocol, including separating the patient from others to avoid possible infections in other people.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon worked on several attractions in various capacities.
 During the 1980s, he worked on such programs as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracey Ullman show.
 In the year 1989, he helped create the Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and was responsible for hiring the show's first writing team.
 Despite leaving the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars each season in royalties.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that a plane had been hijacked.
 Later reports claimed that the plane had been threatened by a bomb and was diverted back to Afghanistan, landing in Kandahar.
 Initial reports say the plane was sent back to Afghanistan after it was denied an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air accidents are common in Iran, which has an enlarged and poorly maintained fleet for both civil and military operations.
 International sanctions prevented the purchase of new aircraft.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crash killed three people and injured three more.
 Last month, Iran suffered the worst air disaster in years when a plane heading to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 It happened again in the same month in Mashhad, another commercial airplane entered a runway and hit a wall, killing seventeen people.
 The Aerosmith canceled the rest of their tour.
 The rock band was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 They canceled the tour after Steven Tyler, the band's vocalist, injured himself by falling off the stage during a performance on August 5.
 Murray suffered a first set defeat in the tie-break after both players had served in the set.
 Del Potro held an early break in the second set, but that also went to a tiebreaker after reaching 6-6.
 Potro received treatment on the shoulder, but was able to return to the game.
 The program began at 20:30 local time,
 Famous singers throughout the country offered Bhajans, or songs of devotion, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The evening began with the presentation of the singer Singer Sanju Sharma, accompanied by Jai Shankar Choudhary.
 Then Lakkha Singh took the lead to sing the bhajans.
 108 dishes of Chhappan Bhog were served to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh also presented the chhappan bhog bhajan. The singer Raju Khandelwal was accompanying him.
 In the Tokyo Game Show presentation on Thursday, Nintendo's President, Satoru Iwata, showed the design of the new Nintendo Revolution Controller.
 Similar to a television remote, the Controller uses two sensors placed near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 With this, players will be able to control actions and movements in the Video game by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of the car and ended the race just after the start.
 His teammate, Fernando Alonso, led the race for most of it, but his race ended shortly after his pit stop, likely due to a misplaced front tire.
 Michael Schumacher finished his race shortly after Alonso, because of damage to the suspension in the numerous battles during the race.
 She's a cute little thing and she sings very well, said he, according to a transcript of the press conference.
 She felt a great emotion every time we did an ensaio about it, from the bottom of her heart.
 About 3 minutes after launch, a camera on board showed several pieces of the insulating foam breaking away from the fuel tank.
 However, they are not blamed for causing the space shuttle's failure.
 The commander of NASA's space shuttle program, N . Wayne Hale Jr, said the foam had descended after the moment that really left us worried.
 Five minutes later, a wind starts to blow, about a minute later, the wind is coming at 70km/h... then comes the rain, but so strong and so big that it hits your skin like a needle and hail starts to fall from the sky, people in panic and screaming and running over each other.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and on my way there were two disabled people in wheelchairs, people jumping and pushing them.
 NHK also said that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 The Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no effects from the earthquake and that reactors 1 and 2 at its Shika nuclear power station were shut down.
 It has been reported that around 9,400 homes in the region are without water and approximately 100 residences without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged, the railway service was suspended in the affected areas, and the Noto Airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the governor-general's office.
 Three more bombs exploded near government buildings in a two-hour period.
 Some reports say the official death toll was eight, and others confirm that up to 30 were injured, but the final numbers are still unknown.
 Both the cyanide and melanin were found in urine samples from pets that had died after ingesting the contaminated food.
 The two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block the function of the kidney, the University researchers said.
 The researchers found that crystals formed in the cat's urine when they added melanin and cyanuric acid.
 The composition of such crystals corresponds to the compound found in the urine of pets that have been struck by lightning, when those two compositions are compared using infrared by Fourier transform.
 I do not know if you have noticed this or not, but a great deal of the goods from Central America come into this country without paying any duty.
 Still, eighty percent of our goods were taxed with tariffs in Central American countries. We treat you.
 This did not seem to make sense to me, and certainly was not fair.
 All I say to people is that you treat us the way we treat you.
 The governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, signed a bill that prohibits the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The bill requires that violent electronic games sold in the state of California be labeled with a label that reads, quote, unquote,
 The director of public prosecutions, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning announcing the charges against Huhne and Pryce.
 Huhne resigned and will be replaced in the Cabinet by Ed Davey MP Norman Lamb MP is expected to take over the role of Minister of State.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear at Westminster magistrates' court on 16 February.
 The fatalities are Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla was injured in the arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required reconstructive surgery on his face.
 The weapon of Uka failed while pointing at the head of a fifth man Schneider has continuous pain, blindness in one eye, a section missing from his skull and a reconstructed face in titanium.
 Schneider testified via Video-Conference from a U S . Air Force base in his home country.
 In addition to the fourth of July event, Carpanedo competed in two individual races at the Championships.
 His first event was the Slalom, where he received a Did Not Finish in his first run, 36 of the 116 competitors received the same result.
 Her other race, the Slalom Gigante, obtained the tenth position in the group of women sentadas with a combined result of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 slower than the first placed Australian Claudia Loesch and 1:09.02 minutes slower than the ninth placed Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani.
 Four of the women's team failed to finish their runs, and 45 of the 117 women's skiers in the giant slalom failed to qualify.
 The Madhya Pradesh police recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 Vice-Inspector General D K Arya said, we have arrested five people who raped the Swiss girl and recovered her mobile phone and laptop.
 The accused were named as Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 The accused appeared in court with his face covered, said the superintendent of police, Chandra Shekhar Solanki.
 Despite three people being inside the house when it was hit by the car, none of them were injured.
 However, the driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services released the driver of the red Audi TT.
 Initially, he was hospitalized at the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was later transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya has been in the Edinburgh sheriff court since then, accused of the murder of her son.
 She is in custody while awaiting indictment and trial, but any evidence from eyewitnesses could be compromised because her image has been widely circulated.
 This is a common practice in other parts of the United Kingdom, but Scottish justice acts in a distinct way, and the courts consider publication of photos as potentially prejudicial.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson, of the University of Dundee, observes that, quote,
 The Crown Office, which is in charge of the prosecution, has told journalists that no further comments will be made, at least until the indictment.
 The document, according to the leak, will refer to the dispute of borders, which Palestine wants based on the borders before the Six-Day War in 1967.
 Other topics covered include the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both countries, and the question of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a continuous military presence in the valley for ten years after an agreement is signed, while the PA agrees to leave it for only five years.
 The shooters in the supplemental pest control test were under close supervision of the forestry engineers while the test was being monitored and its efficacy was being evaluated.
 In a partnership between the NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia, volunteers were recruited,
 According to Mick O'Flynn, the acting conservation and heritage director of NPWS, the four shooters selected for the first operation were given comprehensive safety instructions and training.
 Yesterday, Martelly promised a new Provisional Electoral Council of nine members.
 It is the fifth Cep of Martelly in four years.
 Last month, a presidential commission recommended the resignation of the CEP as part of a package of measures to move the country forward towards new elections.
 The Commission was the response given by Martelly to the general protests that had been organised against the regime, which had begun in October.
 The occasional violent protests have been triggered by the failure to hold elections, some of which have been scheduled since 2011.
 About 60 cases of iPods with overheating problems were reported, causing a total of six incidents and leaving four people with minor burns.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry of Japan said it was aware of 27 incidents related to the devices.
 In the past week, the METI divulged that the apple had informed them of 34 more incidents of overheating, which the company classified as not serious.
 The Ministry responded by calling the delay of the Apple report a, quote, truly lamentable.
 The earthquake hit Mariana at 07:19 am, local time, which was Friday at 21:19, GMT.
 The office of the emergency management of the Northern Marianas said there were no reported damage in the country.
 In addition, the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center said there was no indication of a tsunami.
 A former Filipino policeman hijacked a bus full of tourists in the Philippine capital of Manila and held them hostage in Hong Kong.
 Rolando Mendoza fired his M16 rifle at the tourists.
 Several hostages have been rescued and at least six have been confirmed dead so far.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released earlier, as well as the Filipino photographers.
 Then, the photographers took the place of an elderly woman who had to go to the toilet.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and entered a career in medicine.
 He trained as an obstetrician and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 Although he was working at the hospital, Liggins began to investigate premature births in his spare time.
 His research has shown that if a hormone is administered, it will speed up the fetal lung maturation of the baby.
 The Xinhua news agency reported that government investigators had recovered two black boxes, the flight data recorders, on Wednesday.
 Other wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer has said that Luna was the first Extreme Queen, my first businesswoman, and that she died on a night with two moons, something exceptional, just like her.
 Dustin Goldust Runnels said, quote, Luna was as crazy as me,
 Among the 1,400 people surveyed before the 2010 Federal elections, the percentage of those who oppose a change in Australia's form of government, to become a Republic, has increased by 8% since 2008.
 The acting Prime Minister Julia Gillard stated during the 2010 election campaign that she believed Australia would become a Republic at the end of the Queen's reign.
 Thirty-four percent of those who participated in the survey shared this view, wishing that Queen Elizabeth II be the last monarch of Australia.
 At the other end of the spectrum, 29% of those surveyed believe that Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible, while 31% believe that Australia should never become a Republic.
 The Olympic gold medallist was supposed to swim in the 100 and 200 metres freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth Games, but due to his complaints, his fitness was questioned.
 He was unable to take the medicines he needed to overcome the pain, as these are banned in the Games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number as of January twenty five.
 Several people have verified the discovery using different types of hardware and software, in early February, and it was announced on Tuesday.
 It is possible that comets have been a source of water to the earth, along with the organic matter that can develop proteins and make life possible.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how the earth formed, since comets have been hitting the earth for a long time.
 Cuomo, 53, began his term in office earlier this year and signed a law last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He referred to the rumors as being, quote, politicization and nonsense.
 It is rumored that he will run for the Presidency in 2016.
 The NextGen is a system that the FAA says would allow planes to fly in shorter routes, saving millions of gallons of fuel each year and reducing carbon emissions.
 It uses satellite-based technology instead of the older, more traditional ground-based radar technology to allow air traffic controllers to locate aircraft with greater precision and to provide pilots with more accurate information.
 There will be no extra transportation and surface trains will not be stopping at Wembley.
 The problem of transportation increased the possibility of the game having to be played behind closed doors, without the presence of the fan.
 On Thursday, the magazine Science published a study that reported the discovery of a new bird species in the Galapagos Islands, in Ecuador.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden report that the new species evolved in just two generations, although it was believed that this process would take much longer, due to reproduction between a Darwin's finch, Geospiza Darwin, and the cactus immigrant finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be worked in any type of shape. It can even be rolled into small formats.
 It can be stretched to form a thin wire, and can be twisted, and woven, and hammered, and wound.
 It can be very thin and glued to another metal, and because it is so thin, it was sometimes used to decorate hand-painted pictures in books called illuminated manuscripts.
 This is called a PH chemical. You can make a marker using beetroot juice.
 The juice of the cabbage changes color depending on how acidic or basic the chemical is.
 The pH level is indicated by the amount of hydrogen ions, or H in pH, in the chemical being tested.
 The hydrogen ions are protons that have had their electrons removed,
 Mix the two powders and, with clean hands, mold them into the shape of a ball.
 The moisture from the hands reacts with the outer layers, which causes a strange sensation and forms a kind of shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had a toilet with a flush in almost all the houses, connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 Parts of the sewage systems were found in the houses of Minoan Crete and Santorini, in Greece.
 There were also toilets in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China. In the Roman civilization, the toilets were sometimes part of the public baths, which were frequented by both men and women.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you're using a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and then redirects it back almost instantly.
 The satellite was sent into space by a rocket, and scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts some of our light and vision.
 It takes a giant rocket more than 30 meters tall to get a satellite or telescope into space.
 The wheel has changed the world in incredible ways, the greatest thing the wheel has done for us is to give us a much easier and faster way to transport ourselves.
 We've given you the train, the car, and several other forms of transportation.
 Below them are the medium-sized cats that feed on medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Lastly, there are many small cats, including stray cats, which eat small, much more numerous, animals such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The revelation for their success is the concept of a niche, a special function that each cat performs which keeps them from competing with each other.
 Lions are the most social of the big cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The flocks consist of one to three adult males of the same family, along with up to 30 females and their young.
 Women are intimately related to each other, being a large family of sisters and daughters.
 Leopard cats act in a similar way to groups of wolves or dogs, animals surprisingly similar to leopards in behaviour, and also very deadly to their prey.
 A well-balanced athlete, the tiger can climb, although not well, swim, jump great distances, and pull with five times the strength of a human.
 The tiger is in the same group as the lion, the leopard, and the jaguar, which are the only four felines that can roar.
 The roar of the tiger is not like the roar of a lion, but more like a sentence of words gritted and snarled.
 Jaguars like to eat small animals, they capture monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds if they can.
 Scientists believe that the jaguar follows and finds its prey by smelling where it has been on the ground.
 They can see very well in the dark with their night vision and also can move in a furtive way.
 When a small group of living things (a small population) separates from the main population from which it came,
 This new environment has different resources and new competitors, so the new population will need to acquire different characteristics from those it already possesses and adapt to become a strong competitor.
 The original population has not changed at all, they still need the same adaptations as before.
 As time goes on, however, as the new population begins to adapt to its new environment, it will become less and less like the other population.
 Eventually, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will seem so different that they cannot be called the same species.
 We call this process speciation, which simply means the formation of new species speciation is an inevitable consequence and a very important part of evolution.
 Plants produce the oxygen that humans breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants use the sun as their food by means of photosynthesis, and they also provide shade.
 We build our houses using plants, and we make our clothes using plants, the majority of the food we eat is plants.
 The Mosasaurus was the apex predator of its era, so the only thing it feared was other Mosasaurus.
 His long jaws were lined with more than 70 sharp teeth, along with an extra set in the roof of his mouth, showing that nothing that crossed his path could escape.
 We're not sure, but it may have had a forked tongue, its diet including turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and may have even been a cannibal.
 He also attacked anything that entered the water, even a dinosaur as big as the T-Rex.
 Although most of their foods were familiar, the Romans still had their share of strange or unusual foods, such as wild boar, peacock, snail, and a type of rodent called the arganaz.
 Another difference was that, while the poor and women ate sitting in chairs, the rich men liked to have banquets where they would lie on their sides while eating.
 Food in ancient Rome did not include foods originating in the Americas and Asia for Europe, as it did in the centuries that followed.
 For example, they had no corn, no tomatoes, no potatoes, no cacao, and no ancient Roman ever tasted a Peruvian.
 The Babylonians made a primary temple for each of their gods, which were considered the home of their respective deity.
 People made sacrifices to the gods, and priests sought to meet the needs of these gods through ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and an inner sanctuary in which only the priests could enter.
 Sometimes, special pyramids with the shape of towers, called ziggurats, were built to be part of the temples.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the hot climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 Most of the Hebrew family life took place outdoors.
 Women cooked in the courtyard, shops were just open fronts to the street, and stones were used in the construction of houses.
 There were no great forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland's settlement was sparsely populated, and the Norse sagas say that Erik the Red, an Icelandic outlaw, was exiled from Iceland for murder and, while traveling to the West, he found Greenland and gave it its name.
 But, regardless of his discovery, Eskimos had been living there at the time.
 Although all the countries were Scandinavian, there were many differences between the peoples, Kings, customs, and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you may think a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 However, this is not true, although there is something written on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 Written on the Declaration of Independence are the words, Declaration of Independence, original, dated July 4, 1776.
 Though no one knows for sure who wrote it, it is known that, at the beginning of its existence, the great parchment document, which measures 29¾ inches by 24½ inches, was rolled up for storage.
 So it's likely that a note was simply added as a label.
 The landings and the following battles on D-Day liberated the North of France, but the South was still not free.
 It was ruled by the French Vichy government, which was French but made peace with the Germans in 1940 and worked with the invaders instead of fighting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France, the invasion was called the "Operation Dragon".
 In just two weeks, American and French troops had liberated the South of France and were turning their attention to Germany.
 A civilization is a unique culture shared by a large group of people who live and work cooperatively, a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin word civilis, which means civil, related to the Latin word civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or city-state, and which also, in some way, defines the size of the society.
 The city-state is the precursor of the nation, and the culture of civilization depends on the transmission of knowledge from one generation to another,
 Smaller cultures frequently disappear without leaving adequate historical evidence and are no longer recognized as civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen states first formed a weak central government,
 There was no power in the Congress to exact taxes, and as there was no executive or national judiciary,
 In addition, there was no authority to revoke fiscal laws and tariffs between the states.
 The articles required unanimous consent among all the states before they could be amended and the states gave so little importance to the central government that their representatives were almost never present.
 The Italian football team, along with the German team, is the second most successful in the world, and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby union, cycling, ice hockey, and Formula One racing.
 Winter sports are more popular in the northern regions, with Italians competing in international games and Olympic events.
 Japan has about 7,000 Islands, the largest being Honshu, making Japan the 7th largest Island in the world.
 Due to the cluster of Islands that Japan has, Japan is often referred to, in a geographical position, as an Arcipelago.
 The foundation of Taiwan dates back to the fifteenth century, when Europeans who were sailing through the region named it Ilha Formosa.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company inaugurated a base in the Southwest of Taiwan, initiating a transformation in the aboriginal grain production practices and employing Chinese to work in their rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the forces of the Qing dynasty, which ruled China from 1644 to 1912, took control of Taiwan's West and North coastal areas and declared Taiwan a province of the Qing dynasty in 1885.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the First Sino-Japanese War, the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki,
 Machu Picchu consists of three main structures, namely the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun, and the Temple of the Three Windows.
 The majority of the buildings within the complex have been reconstructed to give tourists a better idea of how they originally looked.
 In the year 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu was recovered, and this recovery continues to this day.
 As an example, the most common still photography image format on the planet is the 35 mm, which was the size of film that had the most circulation at the end of the analogue film era.
 At present, it is still produced, but the most important thing is that its proportion has been inherited by the formats of digital camera image sensors.
 The format in 35mm is, in fact, confusing, 36mm wide by 24mm high.
 The proportion of the screen in this format, dividing by twelve to get the smallest ratio between integers, is therefore 3:2.
 Many common formats, like the APS family of formats, for example, are equal to or very close to this ratio.
 The much-abused and frequently despised law of thirds is a straightforward guideline that provides a dynamic while maintaining a relative order in a figure.
 According to him, the intersection of the lines that divide the image into thirds vertically and horizontally is the most effective place for the main subject.
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, which had become rich and powerful, came under scrutiny.
 For more than a thousand years, the Christian religion united the European states, despite differences in language and customs.
 All were affected by his influence, from the King to the plebeian.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the church's monetary funds are there specifically for that reason.
 The central leadership of the church had been in Rome for more than a thousand years, and this concentration of power and money led many to question whether this principle was being upheld.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain began a naval blockade of Germany.
 The strategy proved effective, cutting off vital supplies to both military and civilian personnel, although the blockade violated generally accepted international law and was disposed of in several international agreements over the past two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent any ship from entering entire areas of the ocean, and this put ships of neutral nations at risk.
 Germany, once there was a limited response to this tactic, expected a similar attack to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 During the 1920s, the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and nations were those of pacifism and isolation.
 After witnessing the horrors and atrocities of World War I, nations desired to avoid such a situation again in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States of America to accept a job at the Edison company in New York City.
 He arrived in the United States without a cent, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, the head of his previous employment, to Thomas Edison.
 China's ancient history is divided into different dynasties, each representing a different era,
 In addition, between each dynasty there was an unstable era of divided provinces, the most well-known of which was the Three Kingdoms period, which lasted for 60 years between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During these periods, a fierce war raged between many nobles who were fighting for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms era was one of the bloodiest periods in the history of ancient China, thousands of people died fighting to sit on the throne of the great Xi'an Palace.
 There are many social and political effects, such as the use of the metric system, a shift from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people and not to a single ruler.
 In addition, after the revolution, openings were made for all male candidates, allowing the most ambitious and successful to succeed.
 The same is true of the military, since instead of the ranks being based on social class,
 The French Revolution also inspired many other repressed working-class people from other countries to begin their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in matters beyond the worldly life, and he used to frequent a cave known as Hira', on the mountain of Noor,
 The cave itself, which has survived through the ages, gives a very vivid picture of Muhammad's religious inclinations.
 Sitting atop one of the mountains north of Mecca, the cave is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 In fact, it's not easy to find it, even if you know it exists, and once inside the cave, it's total isolation.
 You can't see anything but the blue sky above and the mountains around.
 The great pyramid of Giza is the only one of the seven wonders of the world that still exists today.
 Built by the Egyptians in the 3rd century B.C., the Great Pyramid is one of many large pyramid structures built to honor dead pharaohs.
 The plateau of Giza, or the Giza Necropolis, in the Egyptian Valley of the Kings, contains several pyramids, including the Great Pyramid, several smaller pyramids,
 The great pyramid was created in honor of Pharaoh Khufu, and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor Khufu's wives and family.
 The marking of the arc pointing up has its appearance similar to a V, and the marking of the arc pointing down has its appearance similar to a clamp or a square without the bottom side.
 Cima means you should start at the tip and push the bow, while Baixo means you should start at the fletching and pull the bow.
 In general, an arc to the right produces a softer sound, while an arc to the left produces a louder, more assertive sound.
 You can write your own, but don't forget that the printed bow notes exist for a musical reason, so these should be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, the terrified King Louis XVI, the Queen, Marie Antoinette, their two young children, Marie-Therese, eleven, and Louis-Charles, four, and the King's sister, Madame Elizabeth, were forced to return to Paris from Versailles by a multitude of women from the markets.
 In a carriage, they traveled back to Paris, surrounded by a crowd of people shouting and shouting threats against the King and the queen.
 The crowd of people forced the King and the Queen to keep the windows of their carriage wide open.
 At one point, a protester waved the head of a dead Royal guard in front of the terrified queen.
 The war costs of the United States imperialism in conquering the Philippines were paid by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial regime to cover a large part of the expenses and the interest on bonds with floating rates in the name of the Philippine government through Wall Street banks.
 Of course, the super profits derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people would constitute the basic gains of North American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, it is necessary to understand the context that led to the creation of the order.
 The period in which such events took place is commonly referred to as the High Middle Ages, the period of European history between the eleventh, twelfth, and thirteenth centuries.
 The high Middle Ages were preceded by the Late Middle Ages and followed by the Late Middle Ages, which, by convention, ends around 1500.
 Determinism is a term that encompasses a range of ideas in practice, from the offering of technology or the technological imperative to a strict notion that the human destiny is determined by an underlying logic associated with the laws of science and the manifestation of those laws in technology.
 The majority of interpretations of technological determinism share 2 general ideas: the first is that technological development follows a path that goes beyond the influence of culture or politics, the second is the idea that technology, in turn, has "effects" on societies that are inherent, instead of socially conditioned.
 For example, someone might say that the automobile necessarily results in the development of roads.
 However, a national road network is not economically viable for just a few cars, so new methods of production are developed to reduce the cost of owning a car.
 The possession of cars in mass leads to a higher incidence of accidents on the roads, which leads to the invention of new techniques in the health care system to cure the injured bodies.
 Romanticism had a great element of cultural determinism, drawn from writers like Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 Geography, in the context of Romanticism, made the citizens molded and, with the passing of time, the customs and culture that were in harmony with the place of society, became better than the laws that were eventually obligatory.
 In the same way that Paris is known as the fashion capital of the contemporary world, Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 His fame as a center of luxury began around 400 C.E. and lasted until about 1100 C.E.
 His status declined during the twelfth century, mainly due to the fact that the participants of the crusade had returned bringing gifts such as silks and spices, which were worth more than what the Byzantine markets offered.
 It was at this time that the transfer of the title of fashion capital from Constantinople to Paris took place.
 The Gothic language reached its peak in the period between the 10th and 11th centuries, and also in the 14th century.
 At first, the clothing was heavily influenced by Byzantine culture in the Eastern region.
 However, due to the slow communication channels, styles in the West may lag 25 to 30 years behind.
 By the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began developing its own style. One of the greatest advancements for the time was that, as a result of the Crusades, people began using buttons to close their garments.
 The subsistence agriculture is the agriculture that is carried out for the production of food sufficient to satisfy only the needs of the farmers and their families.
 The subsistence agriculture is a simple, usually organic system that uses native seeds, combined with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize production.
 Historically, the majority of farmers have been involved in subsistence agriculture, and this is still the case in most developing nations.
 Subcultures bring together individuals of similar mentalities who feel neglected by the standards of society and allow them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures may be distinct due to age, ethnicity, class, location, and/or the sex of the members.
 The qualities that determine a subculture as distinct may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of a subculture often signal their affiliation by distinctive and symbolic use of style, which includes fashions, manners, and slang.
 One of the most common ways of illustrating the importance of socialization is to refer to the few unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune, or intentional abuse, have not been socialized by adults while they were growing up.
 These children are called feral or wild. Some of these children were confined by people, usually the parents, in some cases, the abandonment of the child was due to rejection of the child by the parents because of the child's severe intellectual or physical disability.
 Children who are rebellious may have suffered serious trauma or abuse in childhood before they were abandoned or ran away.
 It is supposed that others were created by animals, and it is said that some have lived by themselves in the jungle.
 When completely raised by animals, the wild child displays behavioral patterns almost entirely similar to those of the particular pet, such as fear or indifference to humans.
 Although project-based learning makes learning easier and more interesting, the scaffolding method goes one step further.
 The scaffolding is not a method of learning, but a support for students who are going through a new learning experience, such as using a new computer or starting a new project.
 Scaffolds can be virtual or in person, in other words, a teacher can be considered a scaffold, just like the Microsoft office clip art.
 The virtual scaffolds are internalized in the software with the aim of questioning, alerting and explaining procedures that may be challenging for the student to handle alone.
 Children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons, ranging from neglect to abuse and even extortion.
 No child should grow up in an environment that does not nurture, care for, and educate them.
 We see the family care system as a zone of safety for these children.
 Our adoption platform has the duty to provide safe homes, loving caregivers, regular education, and guaranteed medical care.
 It is assumed that the foster care will meet all the needs that were lacking in the home from which they were taken.
 The Internet combines elements of both interpersonal and mass communication.
 The distinctive characteristics of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of approach to uses and gratifications.
 For example, learning and socialization are indicated as important motivations for using the Internet.
 “Envolvement” and “relationships with continuity” were also identified as new characteristics of motivation by Eighmey and McCord (1998) when they studied the public's reactions to web pages.
 The use of Video-Taping has led to important discoveries in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions,
 Particularly, it is claimed that a person can detect if another person is lying through the correct interpretation of microexpressions.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article, The President's Speech, indicated how people who are incapable of understanding speech because of brain damage are, nevertheless, able to assess sincerity with precision.
 He even suggests that such abilities to interpret human behavior may be shared by animals such as domestic dogs.
 Research from the twentieth century concluded that there are two ways of genetic variation,
 The mutation adds a new genetic variation, and selection removes it from the group of variation that is expressed.
 Segregation and recombination mixes the variation between the two bases with each generation.
 In the savanna, it is difficult for a primate with a digestive system like that of humans, consuming the available plant resources,
 In addition, not acting can have dire consequences: severe depression, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 The resources of plant origin with the greatest accessibility would be the proteins in leaves and legumes, but they are difficult for us, primates, to digest unless they are cooked.
 However, foods of animal origin, such as ants, termites, eggs, are not only easily digested, but also provide proteins in great quantity that contain all the essential amino acids.
 Taking all this into account, it would not be surprising if our own ancestors had solved their protein problems more or less as the Savannah chimpanzees do.
 The interruption of sleep is a process whereby you wake up intentionally during your normal sleep period and then you go back to sleep.
 This can be easily done by using a quiet alarm clock to bring it to consciousness without waking him up.
 If you find yourself resetting the alarm clock while you're asleep, it may be placed on the other side of the room, forcing you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other possibilities based on the biorhythm include drinking plenty of liquid, especially water or tea, a known diuretic, before going to bed,
 The level of inner peace a person has is inversely correlated to their level of physical and spiritual tension.
 The smaller the tension, the more positive the life force present, and every person has the potential to find absolute peace and contentment.
 Everyone can achieve enlightenment. The only thing that gets in the way of that is our own tension and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but it has been enlarged by the Mahayana path of love and by many techniques of Indian Yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple it consists of Kundalini Yoga, meditation and the path of compassionate love.
 With Kundalini yoga, the Kundalini energy is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras, and visualizations.
 The central part of Tibetan meditation is Deity Yoga, whereby visualizing various deities, the channels of energy are cleansed, the chakras are activated, and the consciousness of enlightenment is created.
 Germany was a common villain in the Second World War, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the USA. With the end of the war, systemic, process and culture shocks led to the disintegration of the countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, the former allies were now enemies, and the cold war began.
 The goal was to last for the next 40 years and, in fact, there would be a leadership of replacement troops from the battlefields of Africa to Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 On September 17, 1939, the Polish defense was already destroyed and the only way out was to retreat and regroup along the Romanian bridgehead.
 However, these plans became obsolete almost overnight when more than 800,000 soldiers of the Soviet Red Army created the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after invading the Eastern regions of Poland in violation of the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other international, bilateral, and multilateral treaties.
 The use of ships to transport goods is by far the most efficient way to move people and goods on a large scale across the oceans.
 The work of the Navies has traditionally been to ensure that their country maintains the ability to displace people and goods while, at the same time, interfering with their enemies' ability to displace their own people and goods.
 One of the most noteworthy examples of this was the battle of the Atlantic during the Second World War, when the Americans were trying to move men and materials across the Atlantic ocean to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German navy, using U-Boats in particular, was trying to end this traffic.
 If the Allies had failed, Germany probably would have been able to conquer Britain as it had conquered the rest of Europe.
 It seems that goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 Cultures and ancient tribes began to keep them in order to facilitate the access to milk, hair, meat, and skins.
 The domestic goat is a descendant of the wild goat, which is commonly known as the bezoar.
 Wagonways were built in England from the 16th century.
 Although the cars consisted only of parallel wooden planks, this allowed the horses to pull them at greater speeds and carry heavier loads on the slightly rougher roads.
 Dormentes were implemented early on to keep the rails in place, but gradually it was realized that the rails would be more efficient if they had a metal cover on top.
 This became a common practice, but the iron caused more wear and tear on the wooden wheels of the cars.
 Eventually, the wooden wheels were replaced by iron ones, and in 1767, the first fully iron rails were introduced.
 The first known means of transportation was walking, and humans began to walk upright two million years ago with the emergence of Homo Erectus, which means upright man.
 His predecessor, the Australopithecus, did not walk upright as a rule.
 The adaptations for bipedalism are found in the Australopithecus fossils that date between 4.2 and 3.9 million years ago.
 We can start to live in a way that is more friendly to the environment, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even be activists to reduce future suffering in some degree.
 This is exactly the same as symptomatic treatment in many cases, but if we do not wish to have only a temporary solution, we must find the cause of the problems and cure them.
 It is obvious enough that the world has changed much by the scientific and technological advancements of the human race, and problems have become greater because of the overpopulation and extravagant lifestyle of man.
 After adoption by the Congress on July fourth, a handwritten draft, signed by the President of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson, was sent to a printing shop a few blocks away, to John Dunlap's.
 During the night, between one hundred and two hundred copies were made, now known as Dunlap attacks.
 The first public reading of the document was made by John Nixon, in the Independence hall on the 8th of July.
 On July 6, one was sent to George Washington, who read it to his troops in New York on July 9, and a copy reached London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap copies that still exist are the oldest surviving copies of the document, the original handwritten copy having been lost.
 Many paleontologists today believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and are alive today we call them birds.
 Many people do not think of them as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are still many similarities between birds and dinosaurs.
 They have scales on their feet and claws, lay eggs, and walk on their two hind legs, like a T-rex.
 Almost all computers used today are based on the manipulation of information that is coded in the form of Binary numbers.
 A Binary number can have only one of two values, that is, 0 or 1, and these numbers are classified as Binary digits, or bits, using the language of computing.
 The inner poisoning may not be apparent at once, the symptoms, like vomiting, are so general that a diagnosis cannot be made at once.
 The greatest indication of internal poisoning may be the presence of an open container with medication or toxic household chemicals.
 Check the label for specific first aid instructions related to that particular poison.
 The term insect is used by entomologists in a formal sense to refer to this group of insects.
 This term derives from the old familiarity with bedbugs, which are insects that are quite structured to stick to human beings.
 Both beard and lice are nidicolous, adapted to live in the nests or shelters of their hosts.
 In the United States of America, there are around 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the leading neurological disease in young people and adults.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 The research has shown that women are twice as likely to have multiple sclerosis as men.
 A couple may decide that having a baby is not in their best interest, or in the best interest of their child.
 Such couples are allowed to decide on a plan for adopting the baby.
 In an adoption, the biological parents rescind their parental rights so that another couple can care for the child.
 The main goal of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method, which guides scientific research.
 It's not, in fact, just experimentation, an experiment is a test used to eliminate one of the possible hypotheses or more, to ask questions.
 Naturalists and philosophers concentrated on classical texts, and in particular, the Bible in Latin.
 All of Aristotle's scientific thoughts were accepted, including his psychology.
 As the knowledge of Greek receded, the West found itself distanced from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Several rhythms observed in physiology and in normal behavior are fundamentally dependent on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production through biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not absolutely responses to periodic external stimuli, have been found in most living things, including bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that will continue to function for a period of continuous cycle, even without the interference of the environment.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the main indicators that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase use phages, or viruses, to implant their own DNA into the bacteria.
 They did two experiments that marked or the DNA of the phage with radioactive phosphorus or the protein of the phage with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have a variety of different effects, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the piece of genetic material affected, and whether the affected cells are germ cells.
 Only mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while mutations in other parts of the body can cause cell death or cancer.
 Natural tourism attracts people interested in visiting areas of nature with the goal of enjoying the scenery, including fauna and flora.
 Examples of local activities include fishing, taking photographs, bird watching, visiting parks, and studying the ecosystem.
 An example is visiting, photographing, and learning about orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, by car, people leave the small towns of the interior to go to work in other cities, and they encounter other people who work just in those small towns from which they have come.
 In this dynamic transportation bus, everyone is somehow connected and supporting a system of transportation based on private cars.
 Today, science points out that this carbon-based economy has dislocated the biosphere from the stable state that had allowed human evolution to take place over the last two million years.
 Everyone participates in the society and uses the transportation systems. Almost everyone also complains about these transportation systems.
 In developed countries, we rarely hear similar levels of complaint about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transportation systems generate such complaints, why do they fail daily? Are transportation engineers simply incompetent? Or is something more fundamental going on?
 Flow of traffic is the analysis of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two different points and the interactions they make with each other.
 Unfortunately, studying the flow of traffic is difficult because the behavior of the driver cannot be predicted with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave within a relatively consistent range, so traffic flows tend to have some reasonable consistency and can be represented mathematically.
 To better represent the flow of traffic, relationships were established between the three main characteristics: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 Such relationships assist in the planning, design, and operations of the transportation facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to go airborne, and their ability to fly helped them to escape enemies more easily and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 The majority of insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings along the body.
 This gives them a wider range of small places to hide from predators.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings back are the dragonflies and the mayflies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the solar system moved around the sun.
 Some people thought he was right, but many believed the opposite, that the solar system, including the sun, moved around the earth.
 This sounds sensible, because the planet earth doesn't seem to be moving, does it?
 The Amazon is the largest and second-longest river in the world, carrying more than eight times the amount of water that the second-largest river carries.
 The Amazon is also the largest river in the world, sometimes with a width of nearly 10 kilometres.
 A total of 20% of the water that flows from the rivers of the planet to the oceans comes from the Amazon.
 The main Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long. It receives water from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Despite the fact that the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza were never equalled in size and technical excellence.
 The New Kingdom Egyptians marveled at the constructions of their predecessors, which were until then much more than a thousand years old.
 The Vatican City has about 800 people, and is the smallest independent country in the world, with the smallest population.
 The Vatican City uses Italian in its legislation and official communications.
 The Italian language is also the common language used by most of those who work in the state, while Latin is frequently used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of the Vatican city are Roman Catholics.
 Since ancient times, people have known basic chemicals like gold, silver and copper because all of them can be found in nature in their natural form and are relatively simple to extract with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle theorized that everything is a mixture of one or more of four elements, which are earth, water, air, and fire.
 This was more related to the four states of matter, in the same order: solid, liquid, gaseous, and plasma, although he also theorized that they transform into new substances to form what we see.
 Alloys are simply a mixture of two or more metals, and there are many elements in the periodic table.
 Considered elements like calcium and potassium to be metals, of course, there are also metals like silver and gold.
 You can also get alloys that include small amounts of non-metallic elements, like carbon.
 All things in the universe are made of matter, all matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so amazingly small that it would be possible for trillions of them to fit into the period at the end of this sentence.
 The pencil was a good friend to many when it was first introduced.
 Unfortunately, as new writing methods appeared, the pencil was relegated to a lesser and lesser role.
 Currently, people write messages by means of computer screens and do not need to get close to a stylus.
 We can only imagine what the keyboard will become when something newer and better comes along.
 The fission bomb works on the principle that it takes energy to build a nucleus with several protons and neutrons.
 It's more like walking up a hill with a heavy cart, the division of the nucleus releases some of that energy.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means they tend to split apart with little or no incentive.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust, and the outer layer of the moon is called the crust.
 The crust is 70 km thick on the visible side and 100 km thick on the invisible side.
 The layer is thinner under the seas and thicker under the mountains.
 There may be more Maria on the nearest side because the crust is thinner, and it was easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 Content theories focus on finding what motivates people or what attracts them.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs and or desires that are internalized as they reach adulthood.
 These theories analyze what's in certain people that makes them want to do what they do and what things in their environment will make them do or not do certain things.
 Two popular theories of content are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Herzberg's Two-Factor theory.
 In general, two conducts may emerge as managers begin to lead their former co-workers.
 This type of manager has difficulty in making unpopular decisions, adopting disciplinary measures, making performance evaluations, delegating and holding people accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, the person becomes an impossible individual who feels that they must change everything the team has done and do it their own way.
 The leader is ultimately responsible for the success and failure of a team.
 This behavior ends up in conflicts between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams must maintain the same standards of excellence as conventional teams, although there are some subtle differences.
 The members of the virtual team usually act as the point of contact for their immediate physical team.
 They often have more autonomy than conventional team members, as their teams may be in different time zones, which may not be understood by local management.
 The presence of a true invisibles team, Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p.109, is also a unique component of a virtual team.
 The invisible team is the management team for whom each member should report. The invisible team defines the standards for each member.
 Why would an organization want to go through the difficult process of establishing a learning organization? One of the practical goals of the learning organization concepts is innovation.
 When all the available resources are effectively used by all the functional departments of an organization, creativity and ingenuity transpire.
 As a result, the process of a team working together to overcome a difficulty may lead to a new innovative process that meets the client's need.
 Before an organization can be innovative, leaders need to create a culture of innovation, as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) clarifies the Continuum approach as a methodology used to help organizations achieve higher levels in their performance.
 Neurobiological data offers physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition,
 The correlation between cerebral and behavioral pathology informs scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors affect behavior and cause changes in some mental functions.
 The emergence of new technologies allows us to see and investigate brain structures and processes never before seen.
 This gives us a lot of information and material to design simulation models that help us to understand the processes that are going on in our mind.
 Despite the fact that IA has a strong connotation of science fiction, IA is a very important branch of computer science, addressing intelligent behavior, learning, and adaptation in a machine.
 Research in ai involves the production of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent activity.
 Examples include the control, planning and scheduling, the ability to attend to the questions and diagnoses of clients, as well as the recognition of writing, voice and speech.
 These things became separate disciplines, which concentrate on providing solutions to the problems of real life.
 The ai system is often used in the areas of economics, medicine, engineering, and the military, as it is integrated into various software applications of home computers and video games.
 Field trips are very important for any school class, and teachers would love to take their students to places that are not easily accessible by bus.
 Technology offers the solution with virtual field trips, where students can see museum pieces, visit an aquarium, or admire beautiful works of art.
 Sharing a field trip virtually is also a great way to reflect on a field trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, each year, students at Bennet school in North Carolina develop a Website about their trip to the state capital.
 Blogs can also help in the improvement of students' writing, as students often begin their contact with Blogs using poor grammar and spelling,
 As the students are often the most critical audience, the author of the Blog begins to work harder to improve the writing and avoid criticism.
 Besides, having a Blog forces the students to become more knowledgeable about the world around them.
 Writing in Blogs is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages students to extend their learning well beyond the traditional day in the classroom.
 The use of Blogs can make students more analytical and critical, by interacting with the Internet's contents in an active way, students can position themselves in the context of other's writings, as well as define their own perspectives on specific issues.
 Ottawa is the charming and bilingual capital of Canada and boasts a number of art galleries and museums that demonstrate the Canadian past and present.
 The Niagara falls are to the south, and the northern part of Ontario has the unspoiled natural beauty of Muskoka.
 Due to all of this and much more, Ontario stands out as what people from outside consider the essence of Canada.
 Large areas to the North are also sparsely populated, and some are virtually uninhabited.
 For a population of just over 30 million, there are more African-Americans living in the U S. than there are Canadians.
 The Islands of East Africa are in the Indian Ocean, a distance from the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest, and a continent unto itself, when it comes to wildlife.
 The majority of the smaller Islands are independent nations, or associated with France, and are known as luxury Beach-Resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the Islands, which gained much popularity in Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the fifteenth century, when the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama found the route from Europe to India.
 In the North, the region is bordered by the Sahel, and in the South and West by the Atlantic Ocean.
 Women: It is advisable for all travelers to say they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It is also useful to use a ring, but not one that looks too expensive.
 Women should understand that cultural differences may cause acts that they would consider as harassment, and it is not uncommon for women to be followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Be firm in rejecting men. Do not be afraid to be firm,
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC, and was used by the Phoenicians, Romans, and Merinids as a strategic port called Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed and rebuilt it with the name of Casa Branca, only to abandon it after an earthquake in 1755.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt the city as Daru l-Badya, which received the name Casablanca from the Spanish traders who established commercial bases there.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places to shop in Morocco as a whole.
 Near the historic part of Medina is easy to find traditional Moroccan goods, like tagines, ceramics, leather goods, narguilés and a whole bunch of other touristy crap.
 Goma is a tourist city in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, in the extreme East, near Rwanda.
 In two thousand and two, Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried a large part of the city, mainly the center.
 Although Goma is reasonably safe, any visit outside of Goma should be studied to understand the state of the battle that persists in the province of Nord-Kivu.
 The city is also a base for climbing Mount Nyiragongo, along with some of the cheapest gorilla treks in Africa.
 You can use a boda-boda (motorcycle taxi) to tour Goma. The normal price is around 500 Congolese francs for a quick ride.
 Timbuktu came to be used as a metaphor for distant and exotic lands, given its relative inaccessibility.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor city despite its reputation as a tourist attraction, and it has an airport.
 In the year 1990, it was placed on the list of world heritage in danger, due to the danger of the desert's sand.
 It was featured in Henry Louis Gates's Wonders of the African-American world, a PBS television series.
 The city contrasts strongly with the rest of the country because it has a more Arabic than African feel.
 Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa, along the Mozambique border to the east, the Zimbabwe border to the North, and the Crocodile River to the South.
 The park covers 19,500 square kilometers and is divided into 14 different ecological zones, each supporting different animal species.
 It is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is considered the flagship of South Africa's National Parks.
 There are entrance fees to enter and to conserve the park, just like all the other national parks in South Africa.
 It can be very useful to also acquire a Wild Card, which gives you access to several South African parks or to all South African national parks.
 The island of Hong Kong gives its name to the territory of Hong Kong, and is the location that many tourists consider to be its main attraction.
 The parade of buildings that make up the Hong Kong skyline has been compared to a cintillating bar graph that becomes visible by the presence of the Victoria Harbour waters.
 To get the best views of Hong Kong, leave the island and head to the Kowloon waterfront on the opposite side.
 The largest part of Hong Kong's urban development is densely concentrated in reclaimed land along the northern coast.
 This is the place that British settlers chose to live, and so if you're looking for evidence of the territory's colonial past, this is a great place to start.
 Sundarbans is the largest mangrove forest in the world, extending 80 km inland from the coasts of Bangladesh and India.
 The Sundarbans were declared a UNESCO world heritage site. The part of the forest within Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 But the forests are not only Mangrove swamps they have some of the last great forests that once covered the Ganges-Yangtze region.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 square kilometers, with one-third of it being covered by water and marsh.
 Since 1966, the Sundarbans have been a wildlife sanctuary, and it is estimated that there are currently 400 Bengal tigers and around 30,000 spotted deer in the area.
 There are several buses a day from the inter-district bus station, which is across the river, but most of them, especially those going east and to Jakar/Bumthang, leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 As the inter-district buses are almost always crowded, it is advisable to buy the ticket a few days in advance.
 The majority of the districts are served by Japanese coastal microbuses, which are comfortable and durable.
 Shared taxis are a quick and comfortable way to travel to nearby places, such as Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200).
 The Oiapoque bridge is a suspension bridge that spans the Oiapoque River to connect the cities of Oiapoque, Brazil, and Saint George de l'Oyapock, French Guiana.
 The two towers reach a height of 83 meters, have a length of 378 meters and two runways of 3,50 meters wide.
 The vertical clearance under the bridge is 15 meters. The construction was completed in August 2011 and did not open to traffic until March 2017.
 The bridge is scheduled to open in September 2017, when the customs inspections in Brazil are expected to be completed.
 The Guarani were the most significant indigenous group that inhabited what is today the Eastern part of Paraguay, living as hunter-gatherers who also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The region of Chaco was home to other indigenous groups, such as the Guaicurus and the Paiaguas, who lived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 In the sixteenth century, Paraguay, formerly known as the Gigante Província das Índias, emerged from the encounter of the Spanish conquerors with indigenous groups.
 The Spanish began the period of colonization that lasted three centuries.
 Since the creation of Assunción in 1537, Paraguay has succeeded in preserving many of its indigenous peoples' characteristics and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best polo teams and players in the world.
 The biggest tournament of the year takes place in December at the polo fields in Las Cañitas.
 Tournaments and minor matches can also be seen here at other times of the year.
 To find out about tournaments and where to buy tickets for polo matches, check out the Argentinean Polo Association.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound, which is equivalent to the British pound.
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank in the Islands, which is located in Stanley, opposite the FIC West store.
 The pound sterling is generally accepted anywhere in the Islands, and credit cards and U S . dollars are accepted in Stanley.
 In remote Islands, it is unlikely that credit cards will be accepted, although British and American currencies may be received.
 It is practically impossible to change the currency of the Falklands outside the Islands, so exchange your money before you leave the Islands.
 As Montevideo lies south of the equator, it is summer there, while it is winter in the northern hemisphere and vice versa.
 Montevideo is in the subtropical region, and in the summer months, temperatures above 30 °C are common.
 The winters can be disappointingly cold: temperatures rarely fall below freezing, but the wind and humidity combined make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no particularly rainy or dry seasons: the amount of rain remains basically the same throughout the year.
 Although many of the park's animals are used to the presence of humans, they are still wild animals and should not be fed or disturbed.
 Following the instructions of the park authorities, keep at least 100 yards from bears and wolves, and 25 yards from all other wild animals.
 Despite their docile appearance, bison, moose, and bears, like all large animals, can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors get hurt because they didn't keep a proper distance from these animals, which are big, wild and potentially dangerous.
 Besides, know that odors attract bears and other wild animals, however, avoid carrying or cooking food with a strong odor and keep the camping site clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa, a city on the island of Upolu with a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and is the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was the scene of a notorious naval impasse in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave it.
 All but one of the German ships were sunk, with the loss of nearly 200 lives, including those of the German and American crews.
 During the Mau movement, a peaceful rally in the city resulted in the assassination of the chief Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 There are many beaches, as Auckland is situated between two harbours. The most popular beaches are in three areas.
 The beaches of the North Coast range from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 They are almost all sandy beaches with safe swimming, and many have shade from the Pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive are located on the Waitemata Harbour, in the upscale suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, in the central region of Auckland.
 These are sometimes family beaches, crowded with a wide variety of shops around the shore. Swimming is safe.
 The main local beer is the Number One, which is not a sophisticated beer, but it is pleasant and refreshing.
 There are many French wines to enjoy, but New Zealand and Australian wines can be a bit cheaper.
 The local tap water is totally safe to drink, but it's easy to find bottled water if you're worried.
 For Australians, the concept of a flat white is a bit strange, a short black is an espresso, a cappuccino comes full of cream, and tea is served without milk.
 The hot chocolate is in line with Belgian standards. The natural juices are expensive, but great.
 Many trips to the reef are made during the whole year, and injuries from any of these causes, which occur in the reef, are rare.
 Continue to obey the authorities, obey all the signs, and pay close attention to all the safety warnings.
 The Cubomedusa occurs near beaches and estuaries of rivers, from October to April, north of 1770.
 The sharks do exist, but rarely attack humans, most of them are afraid of humans and tend to swim away.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not actively live in the ocean, but their habitat is primarily the estuaries of the rivers north of Rockhampton.
 To book in advance gives the traveler the peace of mind that they will have a place to sleep when they arrive at their destination.
 Travel agents usually do business with specific hotels, although it is likely that they could book other types of accommodation, such as camping parks, through a travel agent.
 Travel agents usually offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even combined packages with flights and hotels.
 They can also guarantee your reservation if you need time to think about the offer or gather other documents for your destination.
 However, if there are any changes or requests, this must first be sent to the travel agent, and not directly to the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the vast majority of festival-goers decide to camp on the site, and most of them consider this to be a fundamental part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action, you'll have to get there early to camp near the music.
 Even after the music on the main stages has ended, some sections of the festival may continue to play late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you cross the Baltic in winter, check the location of the cabin, as the ice will make a terrifying noise for the most sensitive.
 Cruises to St . Petersburg include city tours. Passengers are exempt from the visa requirements.
 Casinos usually make many efforts to maximize the time and money spent by their visitors. In general, there are no windows or clocks, and exits can be difficult to find.
 They generally have special offers of food, drink and entertainment to keep the guests in good humour and to keep them at the event.
 Some locations offer alcoholic beverages for house account, however, intoxication prejudices judgment, and all good gamblers know the importance of keeping sober.
 Whenever someone is driving in places with high latitudes or on roads over the mountains, they should take into consideration the possibility of encountering snow, ice or freezing temperatures.
 On roads with ice and snow, friction is low, and you can't drive as you would on a clean asphalt road.
 During the snowstorms, it is possible to get enough snow to leave you stranded in a very short time.
 The visibility may also be reduced due to snow falling or blowing, or by condensation or ice on the vehicle's windows.
 On the other hand, the conditions of ice and snow are normal in many countries, and traffic remains almost without interruption during the whole year.
 Safaris are probably the biggest tourist attraction in Africa and the jewel in the crown of many a visitor's itinerary.
 The term safari, in its colloquial usage, refers to overland trips to observe the impressive African wildlife, mainly in the savanna.
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes, tend to approach cars, and the basic equipment allows for good viewing.
 The lions, cheetahs, and Leopards are sometimes shy, and you'll see them best with binoculars.
 Also known as a walk in the woods, a nature walk, or a hike, a walking safari is a form of safari that involves walking, whether for a few hours or many days.
 The Paralympics will take place between August 24 and September 5, 2021, with some events being hosted in other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two summer Olympics, having hosted the games in 1964.
 If you scheduled your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the postponement was announced, you may have a complicated situation.
 As of the end of March, most cancellation policies because of the Coronavirus did not extend to July of 2020, when the Olympics were scheduled.
 It is expected that most of the tickets for the events will cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with the normal tickets costing around 7,000 yen.
 Hanging wet clothes to dry can help. Many hotels have an iron and ironing board for guests to use, even if there isn't one in the room.
 If a stove is not available, or if you do not like to use an iron, you can try using a hair dryer, if it is available.
 Be careful not to let the fabric get too hot, which can cause it to shrink or, in more severe cases, cause burns.
 There are different ways of purifying water, some more efficient against specific threats.
 In some areas, boiling the water for one minute is sufficient, in others, many minutes are required.
 The quality of the filters vary and, if you're in doubt, it may be a good idea to consider buying a gallon of water from a trusted company.
 Travellers may encounter pests with which they are unfamiliar in the regions from which they came.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation, or, at worst, cause allergic reactions, spread poison, or transmit infections.
 The diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that can hurt or kill people through force, generally do not qualify as pests.
 Duty-Free shopping is the chance to buy goods free of customs and taxes in certain locations.
 Travellers who visit countries with high taxes can sometimes save a considerable amount of money, especially on items like alcohol and tobacco.
 The stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont presents the most challenging conditions for motorists on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway, which frequently pass through isolated areas of the sertão.
 If you're not used to driving on country roads, beware: steep inclines, narrow roads, and sharp curves are common.
 The speed limits announced are visibly lower than in the preceding and subsequent sections, commonly 55-65 km/h, and strict adherence to them is even more important than in the other direction.
 Interestingly, though, the cell phone service is much stronger here than it is along many other stretches of the route, such as in Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German sweets are very good, and in Bavaria, they are well-made and varied, like those of the neighbouring South, Austria.
 The desserts with fruit are recurrent, with apples baked into the desserts all year long, and cherries and plums marking their presence during the summer.
 Many German bakery goods also have almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts. The famous cakes often combine very well with a cup of very strong coffee.
 If you'd like some small, but tasty, desserts, try what, depending on the region, may be called a Berliner, Pfannkuchen, or Krapfen.
 A curry is a dish based on herbs and spices, together with meat or vegetables.
 A curry can be either dry or wet depending on the amount of liquid.
 In regions of the North of India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries, while in the South of India and other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 With 17,000 Islands to choose from, Indonesian cuisine is a wide range that encompasses a great variety of regional cuisines found throughout the country.
 But if used without other qualifiers, the term tends to mean that the food originally is from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now widely available throughout the archipelago, Javanese cuisine includes a variety of simply spiced dishes, the predominant Javanese condiments being peanuts, chilies, sugar, and various aromatic spices.
 In order for a rider's feet to have support, they use stirrups, which are hung from both sides of the saddle.
 They provide greater stability for the rider, but can present safety issues, as the rider's feet can get stuck in them.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse, but has one of his feet still clinging to the stirrup, he may be dragged along if the animal should happen to be frightened.
 First, a large part of the pilots wears riding boots with a heel and a flat sole, which is quite narrow.
 In addition, some of the newer, especially English, saddles have safety bars that allow a leather stirrup to fall from the saddle if pulled backward by a rider in a fall.
 Being the main climbing destination of Chile, the Cochamó Valley is known as the Yosemite of South America, with a variety of great granite walls and cliffs.
 The meetings include exciting views of the peaks. Alpinists from all parts of the world are continuously establishing new routes among their potential infinity of cliffs.
 Sports that are played on snow, including skiing and snowboarding, are popular sports that involve sliding on snow-covered terrain with skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is an important activity on the trip for many enthusiasts, occasionally known as ski bums, who plan vacations around skiing at a specific location.
 The idea of skiing is very old—paintings on cave walls that depict skiers date back to 5000 B.C.
 Skiing as a sport dates back to at least the 17th century, and in the year 1861, the first recreational skiing team was opened by Norwegian citizens in Australia.
 Backpacking ski: also known as backcountry skiing, touring ski, or ski-alpinism.
 It's related, but usually doesn't involve skiing or mountaineering, the latter of which is done on steep, often very steep, terrain.
 Think of the ski route as a hiking route.
 In good conditions, you'll be able to cover a little bit more distance than on foot, but you'll rarely be able to achieve the speeds of cross-country skiing without a heavy backpack on prepared tracks.
 Europe is a relatively small continent but with many independent countries, and in normal circumstances, travelling from one to the other would mean going through passport and visa controls several times.
 The Schengen zone, however, functions as one country in this regard.
 If you stay in this area, it is possible to cross the border without going through passport control again.
 And the same goes for Schengen visas, which are valid in all of the Schengen countries.
 There is no universal definition specifying which manufactured items are antiques. Some tax agencies define antiques as items that are over 100 years old.
 The definition has geographical variations, where the age limit may be lower in places like North America than in Europe.
 Handmade goods can be defined as antiques, although they are usually younger than similar mass-produced items.
 Reindeer herding is an important means of subsistence among the Sámi, and the culture surrounding the trade is important also to many other classes of professionals.
 Even though it's a tradition, not all Sami participated in the large-scale reindeer herding, but they lived off of fishing, hunting, and things like that,
 Today, many Sámi work in modern businesses. Tourism is an important source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi area.
 Although it is widely used, especially among non-Romany, the term Gypsy is often considered offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions about the Romani.
 If the country you are visiting is subject to travel advisories, your travel insurance or your travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 It is also recommended that you consult other governments besides your own, but their advice is given to their respective citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may face situations different from those faced by Europeans or Arabs.
 Advice is only a brief summary of the political situation in a nation.
 The views presented are usually superficial, general, and simplified in relation to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Weather is the generic term for any dangerous climatic phenomenon with the potential to cause damage, serious social disruption, or loss of human life.
 Weather can occur anywhere in the world and encompasses different types, which vary according to geographical location, topography and meteorological conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, excessive rainfall and forest fires are forms and effects of a rigorous climate, as are storms, tornadoes, water spouts and cyclones.
 Severe regional and seasonal climatic phenomena include snowstorms, blizzards, and dust and sandstorms.
 Travellers are strongly advised to be aware of any risk of bad weather in their region, as this may affect travel plans.
 When planning a visit to a country that is considered a war zone, the person must first receive professional training.
 A search on the Internet for a course in hostile environment will usually indicate the address of a company in the region.
 A course will normally cover all the topics discussed here with much more detail, usually with some practical experience.
 A course typically lasts between 2 and 5 days and involves drama, several first aid techniques, and sometimes training with weapons.
 Books and magazines about survival in the jungle are common, but publications about war zones are rare.
 Travellers planning a sex change operation abroad should ensure that they are carrying valid documents for the return journey.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports with gender undefined,
 The willingness of foreign governments to honor these documents is widely variable.
 The searches at security checkpoints also became much more intrusive after the September 11, 2001, attacks.
 Transgender people who have not yet had the surgery to change their gender should not be expected to pass through the scanners with their privacy and dignity intact.
 The current of the sea is the reflux of the water from the waves, generally in a reef or similar area.
 Due to the subaqueous topography, the return flow is concentrated in some of the deeper sections, and a rapid current may be formed for deep water there.
 The majority of deaths are a result of fatigue from trying to swim against the current, which can be impossible.
 As soon as you get out of the current, swimming back is no more difficult than it would be in any other situation.
 Try to aim from somewhere where you won't be caught or, depending on your skills, if you've been detected, wait for rescue.
 The re-entry shock occurs before the culture shock, lasts longer, and can be more severe.
 Travellers who have adapted easily to the new culture sometimes have a special difficulty in adjusting to their native culture.
 When you return home after living abroad, you adapt to the new culture and lose some of the habits you developed in your home culture.
 When you went abroad for the first time, people were probably patient and understanding, knowing that travelers in a new country need time to adapt.
 People don't realize that patience and understanding are also key for travelers who are returning home.
 In the children's area, one of the most interesting things is the light and sound show of the pyramid.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and also in silence before the show begins.
 You're always going to hear the sound of tourists and vendors, the history of the sound and the light is like a book of stories.
 The Sphinx is defined as a background and narrator of a long history.
 The scenes are displayed on the pyramids, and different pyramids are illuminated.
 The Shetland Islands, which were discovered in the year eighteen hundred and nineteen, are claimed by several countries and have the largest number of bases, with sixteen active as of the year two thousand and twenty.
 The archipelago lies 120 km to the north of the peninsula, and the largest island is King George Island, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 The others are Livingston Island and Deception, where the caldera of a still active volcano provides a natural harbor.
 The Ellsworth land is the Southern region of the peninsula, coasting the Bellingshausen sea.
 The mountains of the Peninsula here merge into the plateau, then re-emerge to form the 360-kilometre chain of the Ellsworth mountains, cut by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part, or Sentinel Range, has the highest mountains in Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, reaching 4,892 m on Mount Vinson.
 In remote locations, without cellular coverage, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 A satellite phone generally does not replace a cell phone, since to make a call you need to be outdoors with a clear view of the satellite.
 The service is often used for transportation, including recreational boating, as well as expeditions that have remote data and voice requirements.
 Your local telephone company may be able to offer you more information about connecting to this service.
 One option that is becoming increasingly popular for those who want to take a gap year is to travel and learn.
 This is especially popular among those who leave school, allowing them to take a year off before going to university.
 In most cases, applying to a course abroad during a gap year can, in fact, increase your chances of entering higher education in your home country.
 There will usually be a registration fee to enroll in these educational programs.
 For those who like boat trips, Finland is a great destination, with its lakes and archipelagos, the land of a thousand lakes also has thousands of islands.
 In archipelagos and lakes, you don't necessarily need a yacht.
 Despite the fact that the coastal archipelagos and the largest lakes are really big enough for any yacht, smaller boats or even canoes offer a different experience.
 Boating with a canoe is a national pastime in Finland, with a canoe for every seven or eight people.
 This is combined by Norway, Sweden, and New Zealand, but a form characteristic of the Netherlands, for example, is one to forty.
 Most Baltic cruises offer an extended stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 This means you can visit the historic city for two full days and return to the ship for the night.
 If you are only going on a sea excursion, you do not need a separate visa, valid as of 2009.
 Some cruise lines show Berlin, Germany, on the brochure, as you can see on the map above, Berlin is not near the sea, and a visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Flying by airplane can be a scary experience for people of all ages and backgrounds, especially if those people have never flown by airplane before or if they have never been through a traumatic event.
 It's not something to be ashamed of, and it's not different from the personal fears and antipathies that many people have.
 For some, understanding something about how aircraft work and what happens during a flight can help to overcome the fear that is based on the unknown or not being in control.
 Transportation companies are well paid to deliver things quickly. Frequently, time is very important in the shipping of commercial documents, goods, or spare parts for an urgent repair.
 In some routes, the bigger companies have their own planes, but for other routes and smaller companies, there was a problem.
 If they sent things by air freight, depending on the route, it could take days to get to the port of disembarkation and go through customs.
 The only way to get through it faster was to send it as a Dispatched bag,
 The obvious way to fly first or business class is by paying a large sum of money for the privilege.
 However, it's not cheap: as a basic rule, you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare for business class and eleven times the normal economy fare for first class.
 In general, it's not worth even looking for discounts on seats in the first or business class on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know very well that there is a small group of passengers who are willing to pay a high price for the privilege of getting somewhere quickly and comfortably, and they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau, and the language of the country is Romanian, although Russian is widely spoken.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic that has suffered from ethnic conflicts.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic in the east of Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any of the UN member states.
 Economic relations were restored between these two parts of Moldova, despite the failure of political negotiations.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey, with approximately 3.7 million people, and it has the second largest port after Istanbul,
 Once the ancient city of Ephesus, now it's a modern, developed, and bustling commercial center, located around a large bay and surrounded by mountains.
 The wide avenues, the glass-fronted buildings and the modern shopping centers are marked by traditional red roofs, the 18th-century market, and the old mosques and churches, although the city has an atmosphere that reminds one more of the Mediterranean Europe than of classical Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvik offers views of the neighboring Eysturoy Island and has an unusual octagonal church.
 In the churchyard, there are interesting marble sculptures of doves on tombs of people.
 It's worth the half-hour walk through the intriguing village.
 To the North, and easily accessible, is the romantic and fascinating city of Sintra, which became famous among foreigners after an exuberant account of its splendor was made by Lord Byron.
 The Scotturb 403 bus travels to Sintra frequently, with a stop at Cabo da Roca.
 Also to the North, visit the great Santuário de Nossa Senhora de Fátima, a place famous throughout the world for Marian apparitions.
 Recall that you are basically making a visit to a huge cemetery, also as a place that has a meaning practically incalculable to a portion of the world's population.
 There are still many, many people alive today who survived that period here and many others, both Jewish and non-Jewish, whose loved ones were murdered or worked to death.
 Please treat the site with all the dignity, solemnity, and respect it deserves.
 Do not damage the place by staining or cracking the buildings with graffiti.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. Almost half of the people prefer to speak Catalan, most of them understand it, and almost all of them speak Spanish.
 But most of the signs are in Catalan, because that is the language that was established by law as the official language.
 Still, Spanish is widely used in public transport and other facilities.
 The regular announcements on the metro are made only in Catalan, but unplanned interruptions are announced by an automated system in a wide variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic, and Japanese.
 The Parisians have a reputation for being egocentric, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is often just a stereotype, the best way to get along in Paris is still to act like someone who is well-bred,
 The brusque exterior of the parisian will quickly disappear if you show some basic courtesies.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily wooded, mostly with beech, fir, and pine, and features a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 There is a remarkable diversity of plant communities, due to the varied microclimates, different soils and varying levels of altitude.
 The area also hosts a wide variety of animal and bird species.
 Animals such as the Eurasian Brown bear, wolves, Eagles, Owls, Lynx, Wildcats and Tetrazes can be found there, as well as several other common species.
 While visiting the monasteries, women are required to wear skirts covering their knees and also to have their shoulders covered.
 The majority of the monasteries provide clothing for women who arrive unprepared, but if you bring your own, especially with bright colors, you will be greeted with a smile from the monk or the nun.
 Similarly, men are required to wear pants that cover the knees.
 It is possible to borrow clothes at the entrance, but they are not washed after each use, so you may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts.
 Majorcan cuisine, like that of similar areas in the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork, and uses olive oil in everything.
 A simple and popular dish, especially in the summer, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomato, and any other ingredients one has on hand, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns, along with the word Sie for you, always start with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way of distinguishing between some verbs and objects.
 This also makes the reading easier, no doubt, although the writing is somewhat complicated by the necessity of discovering whether a verb or an adjective is used in the substantivated form.
 Pronunciation is relatively easy in Italian, since most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The main letters to be observed are C and G, because their pronunciation varies according to the vowel that follows.
 In addition, make sure you pronounce R and Rr differently: caro means dear, while carro means car.
 The Persian language has a relatively easy and, above all, a relatively regular grammar.
 Therefore, the reading of this grammar book will help you to learn a great deal about Persian grammar and to understand the Persian sentences better.
 And it's not necessary to say that if you have knowledge of a Romance language, it will be easier to learn Portuguese.
 However, people who speak a little bit of Spanish may conclude hastily that Portuguese is similar enough to Spanish to not require studying separately.
 The pre-modern observatories are mostly out of date today and remain in museums or schools.
 As the light pollution in their heyday was not a problem, they tend to be found in cities or university campuses, which are easier to reach than the more recently built ones.
 The majority of modern research telescopes are huge installations in remote areas that have favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The observation of the cherry blossom, known as hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept came from China, where the flowers of the plum tree were the preferred flower.
 In Japan, the first cherry blossom festivals were held by the Emperor for himself and other members of the aristocracy around the Imperial court.
 Plants look better in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to remove even just one.
 If you visit a formally arranged garden, collecting specimens will also get you thrown out, without a right to discussion.
 Singapore is generally a very safe and easy place to explore, and you can buy almost anything after you arrive.
 But being in the high tropics, just a few degrees north of the equator, you'll need to deal with both the heat and the sun.
 There are also some buses going to the North to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the Biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, and their wives.
 Check to see if the bus you intend to take goes all the way to Hebron, and not just to the nearby settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 The interior water courses may be a good theme around which to organize a holiday.
 For example, visiting the castles of the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley or taking a boat ride to the Danube's points of interest or sailing on the Erie Canal.
 They also define routes for popular hiking and cycling trails.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity and is celebrated as the anniversary of Jesus's birth.
 Many of the holiday's traditions have been adopted by non-Christians and non-Christian countries around the world.
 There is a tradition of spending Easter morning awake somewhere open to see the sunrise.
 There are, of course, Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it may be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 The most traditional churches hold an Easter Vigil on Saturday night during the Easter weekend.
 All of the animals that originally came to the Islands came here by swimming, flying, or boating.
 Due to the long distance from the mainland, mammals could not make the journey, which made the giant tortoise the main animal of the Galapagos.
 Since the arrival of humans in Galapagos, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs.
 If you're going to visit the Arctic or Antarctic in the winter, you'll experience a polar night, which means the sun doesn't rise above the horizon.
 This is a great opportunity to see the northern lights, as the sky will be darker at roughly the right time.
 As the areas are sparsely populated, and consequently, light pollution is not a problem, you will also be able to enjoy the stars.
 In Japan, cultural workplace relationships are based more on hierarchy and formality than Westerners are used to.
 The suits are the standard attire in business, and co-workers call each other by their first names or job titles.
 Harmony in the workplace is crucial, emphasizing the effort in group instead of enhancing individual achievements.
 The workers generally need the approval of their superiors for all decisions they make, and they are expected to obey the instructions of their superiors without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.42597960174008526, 'precisions': [0.7110512789132297, 0.4915535509127271, 0.3618213348748277, 0.2693579177725008], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9915506049771372, 'length_ratio': 0.9915861008858865, 'translation_length': 24513, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 66.65929513609986, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8743135233818307, 'scores': [0.717424213886261, 0.8985794186592102, 0.9007253646850586, 0.8344414830207825, 0.8683918714523315, 0.843813955783844, 0.7848507761955261, 0.8920053839683533, 0.919990062713623, 0.8909491300582886, 0.9172272086143494, 0.8841462731361389, 0.8912183046340942, 0.8425652384757996, 0.8463717103004456, 0.7964897155761719, 0.8264089822769165, 0.853975236415863, 0.9238460659980774, 0.8665657639503479, 0.9415401816368103, 0.9309600591659546, 0.9458531737327576, 0.869631826877594, 0.8846542239189148, 0.9393172860145569, 0.8623951077461243, 0.8677086234092712, 0.7330264449119568, 0.9007871747016907, 0.7137580513954163, 0.726996660232544, 0.8561945557594299, 0.907184898853302, 0.9445875287055969, 0.8790093064308167, 0.9152947068214417, 0.9129770398139954, 0.8954820036888123, 0.9243566989898682, 0.880232036113739, 0.9552849531173706, 0.9259238839149475, 0.9051111936569214, 0.8956858515739441, 0.8325397372245789, 0.8443723917007446, 0.9204826354980469, 0.9269446134567261, 0.9042603373527527, 0.9372084736824036, 0.9151032567024231, 0.9182945489883423, 0.9121034145355225, 0.9097060561180115, 0.8963935375213623, 0.8822222352027893, 0.8897042870521545, 0.9188393950462341, 0.9597212672233582, 0.884945809841156, 0.9102221131324768, 0.7351598143577576, 0.895361602306366, 0.9009583592414856, 0.9083052277565002, 0.8108543753623962, 0.8236337304115295, 0.9134747385978699, 0.8723264336585999, 0.8815669417381287, 0.8847317099571228, 0.6612465381622314, 0.864235520362854, 0.8693560361862183, 0.7881971597671509, 0.9042767882347107, 0.8648790121078491, 0.9424282908439636, 0.9050610661506653, 0.9454348087310791, 0.8961812853813171, 0.854005753993988, 0.7442551255226135, 0.9106174111366272, 0.8587743043899536, 0.6742627024650574, 0.9181490540504456, 0.9126172661781311, 0.8706753849983215, 0.8616699576377869, 0.89578777551651, 0.8249629735946655, 0.807555615901947, 0.9235889315605164, 0.9331842660903931, 0.8894431591033936, 0.8044785857200623, 0.8694279789924622, 0.8910933136940002, 0.9289320111274719, 0.8926604390144348, 0.9077035188674927, 0.9553459286689758, 0.9035857915878296, 0.8873710632324219, 0.8406030535697937, 0.896618664264679, 0.8366461396217346, 0.789964497089386, 0.9286548495292664, 0.9312483668327332, 0.9351018071174622, 0.9447957277297974, 0.8811147809028625, 0.8515873551368713, 0.8832650780677795, 0.892086923122406, 0.9567766785621643, 0.7860680222511292, 0.5334818959236145, 0.841919481754303, 0.9120094180107117, 0.9115180373191833, 0.8703905940055847, 0.7783929109573364, 0.930324137210846, 0.9233381748199463, 0.8831465244293213, 0.8961513638496399, 0.8663399815559387, 0.8752121329307556, 0.9226378798484802, 0.863717257976532, 0.8547651171684265, 0.8627114295959473, 0.896600604057312, 0.9361998438835144, 0.9516867995262146, 0.8445369005203247, 0.8339170813560486, 0.7504193186759949, 0.9299905300140381, 0.8646917343139648, 0.8978670239448547, 0.9134406447410583, 0.8729372024536133, 0.8927130103111267, 0.8941022157669067, 0.9092667698860168, 0.8985183835029602, 0.5009791254997253, 0.8146266937255859, 0.8426422476768494, 0.8850558400154114, 0.8540835380554199, 0.9104952216148376, 0.7882886528968811, 0.8769298195838928, 0.9281608462333679, 0.9187330007553101, 0.6950822472572327, 0.9282121658325195, 0.9026238918304443, 0.911873996257782, 0.8569573760032654, 0.9024088382720947, 0.8805379271507263, 0.8840300440788269, 0.4357507526874542, 0.8986679911613464, 0.934392511844635, 0.9168360829353333, 0.8660790324211121, 0.8923709988594055, 0.9228596091270447, 0.8841736316680908, 0.9442337155342102, 0.8941149115562439, 0.8570064306259155, 0.919381320476532, 0.9535046219825745, 0.9031088352203369, 0.8742606043815613, 0.8355490565299988, 0.925654947757721, 0.9522261023521423, 0.8078882098197937, 0.8241625428199768, 0.8849839568138123, 0.8350483775138855, 0.9119974374771118, 0.868146538734436, 0.8538956642150879, 0.9598595499992371, 0.9464989900588989, 0.5104243159294128, 0.3063553273677826, 0.8885220885276794, 0.8806148171424866, 0.8597132563591003, 0.8266251683235168, 0.8086212277412415, 0.7559950947761536, 0.9136127233505249, 0.8930733799934387, 0.8696070313453674, 0.8965461850166321, 0.9404074549674988, 0.9155208468437195, 0.9470407366752625, 0.9044889807701111, 0.8546503186225891, 0.932635486125946, 0.9405876994132996, 0.9460025429725647, 0.9389626383781433, 0.9191864132881165, 0.9040295481681824, 0.9179739356040955, 0.9301038384437561, 0.9439321160316467, 0.9238842725753784, 0.868216335773468, 0.8096572756767273, 0.9538422226905823, 0.8904984593391418, 0.7210405468940735, 0.8628197908401489, 0.8968603014945984, 0.8093611001968384, 0.9106879830360413, 0.6914102435112, 0.9331857562065125, 0.585313081741333, 0.9360226988792419, 0.8700808882713318, 0.8945587277412415, 0.9006938934326172, 0.923254668712616, 0.807498037815094, 0.8493238687515259, 0.8764699101448059, 0.7214265465736389, 0.9085411429405212, 0.82078617811203, 0.8218536376953125, 0.8548245429992676, 0.8226332664489746, 0.9408740401268005, 0.9252602458000183, 0.9174054265022278, 0.9304736852645874, 0.949182391166687, 0.9466869235038757, 0.9282276034355164, 0.882392168045044, 0.926344096660614, 0.874870240688324, 0.747637927532196, 0.8846065998077393, 0.89234858751297, 0.9178621172904968, 0.9344733357429504, 0.9123255610466003, 0.6593179702758789, 0.9053645730018616, 0.8270597457885742, 0.9323992729187012, 0.933826744556427, 0.8806158304214478, 0.7929407358169556, 0.8769348859786987, 0.8296284675598145, 0.8280097842216492, 0.7792063355445862, 0.81293123960495, 0.957454264163971, 0.8613974452018738, 0.96253502368927, 0.9069352746009827, 0.8816713690757751, 0.9266335368156433, 0.9134296178817749, 0.9244231581687927, 0.9402928352355957, 0.8841367363929749, 0.9070205688476562, 0.9199020266532898, 0.5353826880455017, 0.9080935120582581, 0.887747585773468, 0.9088723063468933, 0.9039425849914551, 0.8578618764877319, 0.7802528738975525, 0.8794357180595398, 0.8545202612876892, 0.7099860310554504, 0.9060998558998108, 0.8551828265190125, 0.8733082413673401, 0.89119952917099, 0.8887684941291809, 0.7291582226753235, 0.8123483061790466, 0.8420012593269348, 0.8755501508712769, 0.9262240529060364, 0.9054223299026489, 0.9714457392692566, 0.9535350203514099, 0.9076599478721619, 0.7098471522331238, 0.9719197154045105, 0.9422598481178284, 0.910267174243927, 0.9010899662971497, 0.8900712132453918, 0.9305259585380554, 0.7493805289268494, 0.5979741811752319, 0.8455941081047058, 0.8580609560012817, 0.8789354562759399, 0.8673290014266968, 0.8818912506103516, 0.8995565176010132, 0.9096121191978455, 0.9148462414741516, 0.9077051877975464, 0.8783479332923889, 0.932905375957489, 0.826244056224823, 0.9261354804039001, 0.9151918888092041, 0.9153216481208801, 0.7847446799278259, 0.8361384868621826, 0.8913394212722778, 0.843452513217926, 0.8827571272850037, 0.7435794472694397, 0.85715252161026, 0.8632939457893372, 0.8772191405296326, 0.9118664860725403, 0.7831265926361084, 0.8545407056808472, 0.8805572390556335, 0.8921031355857849, 0.7943278551101685, 0.8966466784477234, 0.9596505165100098, 0.9040680527687073, 0.9197574853897095, 0.9035629630088806, 0.8873129487037659, 0.7531843185424805, 0.8662260174751282, 0.8588294386863708, 0.8910934329032898, 0.898860514163971, 0.8508498668670654, 0.9112885594367981, 0.837375283241272, 0.8235428929328918, 0.841871976852417, 0.7972812652587891, 0.7963612079620361, 0.7635558247566223, 0.6684531569480896, 0.6154950261116028, 0.8846358060836792, 0.9430572390556335, 0.8916630148887634, 0.9368460178375244, 0.8852859735488892, 0.8525477051734924, 0.8975699543952942, 0.8692055344581604, 0.8883759379386902, 0.8441386818885803, 0.8661167621612549, 0.8387686014175415, 0.8656155467033386, 0.831225574016571, 0.7557300925254822, 0.8069272637367249, 0.8930659890174866, 0.9120663404464722, 0.9291645288467407, 0.9130006432533264, 0.9544665813446045, 0.9289711713790894, 0.904265820980072, 0.8239127397537231, 0.9616041779518127, 0.8241255879402161, 0.908816933631897, 0.9127818942070007, 0.9051997065544128, 0.9327226877212524, 0.7034019231796265, 0.8868114352226257, 0.8603236079216003, 0.923018217086792, 0.866453230381012, 0.9194315075874329, 0.8867473602294922, 0.9240233302116394, 0.8680519461631775, 0.8017333149909973, 0.9184535145759583, 0.8119921088218689, 0.7145391702651978, 0.8784815669059753, 0.893806517124176, 0.8984329104423523, 0.9329251050949097, 0.9467001557350159, 0.9029677510261536, 0.8651127219200134, 0.7993243336677551, 0.9001632928848267, 0.8962780833244324, 0.7327929139137268, 0.9294189214706421, 0.9047092199325562, 0.904873788356781, 0.8740853667259216, 0.7927599549293518, 0.862666666507721, 0.7821910977363586, 0.8777906894683838, 0.7811427116394043, 0.8448650240898132, 0.9656822085380554, 0.9030259847640991, 0.81087726354599, 0.9291717410087585, 0.923906147480011, 0.9560697674751282, 0.8358498811721802, 0.8730281591415405, 0.878092885017395, 0.9556844234466553, 0.9318930506706238, 0.9422001838684082, 0.8263293504714966, 0.8181913495063782, 0.8811764717102051, 0.9418754577636719, 0.8891229033470154, 0.9031280279159546, 0.8674550652503967, 0.7878549695014954, 0.9343538880348206, 0.8474224209785461, 0.894382894039154, 0.9337338805198669, 0.882538914680481, 0.7039405703544617, 0.9096565842628479, 0.9065474271774292, 0.799625813961029, 0.928671658039093, 0.7489144206047058, 0.6908819079399109, 0.7460708618164062, 0.8168819546699524, 0.8098006248474121, 0.8694825768470764, 0.8860726952552795, 0.837785542011261, 0.9017304182052612, 0.865468442440033, 0.9129630327224731, 0.908274233341217, 0.8996582627296448, 0.8909316658973694, 0.8548862338066101, 0.8920290470123291, 0.9045897126197815, 0.9127939343452454, 0.8561100959777832, 0.9390100240707397, 0.8021950721740723, 0.9321720004081726, 0.9150751829147339, 0.8744426965713501, 0.9308038949966431, 0.8586210012435913, 0.91265469789505, 0.8998110294342041, 0.856772780418396, 0.8906450867652893, 0.9058385491371155, 0.9455469846725464, 0.9224397540092468, 0.9471453428268433, 0.9613808989524841, 0.9297881722450256, 0.8978884816169739, 0.8340259790420532, 0.8208615183830261, 0.7383341193199158, 0.8781773447990417, 0.9055200815200806, 0.8269718289375305, 0.836892306804657, 0.8091544508934021, 0.9201151728630066, 0.845659077167511, 0.8982861638069153, 0.8457753658294678, 0.8668190836906433, 0.9612892866134644, 0.919593870639801, 0.8691146969795227, 0.8690305352210999, 0.7142600417137146, 0.8901984095573425, 0.8882129788398743, 0.9528300762176514, 0.8257624506950378, 0.8908780813217163, 0.8058746457099915, 0.7969653606414795, 0.8574120402336121, 0.8592671751976013, 0.885001003742218, 0.7868779301643372, 0.7583580017089844, 0.8571106791496277, 0.891457736492157, 0.7889544367790222, 0.8663069605827332, 0.9169983267784119, 0.9101518988609314, 0.8752091526985168, 0.9033255577087402, 0.8868810534477234, 0.892105758190155, 0.8569162487983704, 0.932341992855072, 0.7370646595954895, 0.8885441422462463, 0.8710232377052307, 0.9300990700721741, 0.8320979475975037, 0.9210255742073059, 0.9024471044540405, 0.9296271800994873, 0.924182116985321, 0.8958877921104431, 0.48790374398231506, 0.8919146060943604, 0.8214287161827087, 0.8330008387565613, 0.8978546261787415, 0.9211235642433167, 0.9024448990821838, 0.867291271686554, 0.7874634265899658, 0.9200783371925354, 0.869407594203949, 0.8889009356498718, 0.8504239320755005, 0.7843624949455261, 0.908499002456665, 0.9192391037940979, 0.8090292811393738, 0.9019162654876709, 0.9390532374382019, 0.7938907742500305, 0.897137463092804, 0.9226931929588318, 0.8934090733528137, 0.8651683330535889, 0.9309649467468262, 0.9468181729316711, 0.9040637612342834, 0.7778440713882446, 0.7636181116104126, 0.879008412361145, 0.9178803563117981, 0.87712162733078, 0.9066070914268494, 0.8542236685752869, 0.9126482605934143, 0.9022161960601807, 0.7677885293960571, 0.9441853761672974, 0.8934065699577332, 0.9236316084861755, 0.9176465272903442, 0.8721588253974915, 0.8627409338951111, 0.9264158606529236, 0.9037488102912903, 0.8839960098266602, 0.9275359511375427, 0.9199349284172058, 0.8989567160606384, 0.9153396487236023, 0.8524245619773865, 0.7595515847206116, 0.8875994682312012, 0.8737667202949524, 0.923477828502655, 0.9152881503105164, 0.9405165314674377, 0.9040273427963257, 0.9061734080314636, 0.9489495158195496, 0.9444864988327026, 0.9177390336990356, 0.9157231450080872, 0.90427565574646, 0.963555634021759, 0.8783553242683411, 0.9311544299125671, 0.8822224140167236, 0.8758509755134583, 0.8878790736198425, 0.8802623152732849, 0.9246862530708313, 0.9069575667381287, 0.8907474875450134, 0.8622586131095886, 0.874980092048645, 0.9616973996162415, 0.9360025525093079, 0.9712472558021545, 0.9020898938179016, 0.913152813911438, 0.9131671190261841, 0.8931056261062622, 0.9077814817428589, 0.9358007311820984, 0.9355130791664124, 0.8810752034187317, 0.8876845240592957, 0.8497018218040466, 0.8364806175231934, 0.9092392325401306, 0.913110077381134, 0.8510153293609619, 0.9086413979530334, 0.9217271208763123, 0.8921183943748474, 0.8521704077720642, 0.850269615650177, 0.9073073863983154, 0.9415430426597595, 0.9042733311653137, 0.91534423828125, 0.6869208216667175, 0.9115006327629089, 0.8087781071662903, 0.9238172173500061, 0.9109800457954407, 0.9244552850723267, 0.940721869468689, 0.9117020964622498, 0.8319844603538513, 0.9121242165565491, 0.8968208432197571, 0.9325763583183289, 0.8888697028160095, 0.9402179718017578, 0.9162635803222656, 0.7859846949577332, 0.8895991444587708, 0.8978877663612366, 0.936005711555481, 0.916725218296051, 0.9061977863311768, 0.8757700324058533, 0.846845805644989, 0.9482423663139343, 0.854314386844635, 0.8714306950569153, 0.8757790923118591, 0.9325476884841919, 0.7951488494873047, 0.7951682209968567, 0.8804353475570679, 0.7452313303947449, 0.8977553844451904, 0.8522273302078247, 0.9102551341056824, 0.8242341876029968, 0.8272120356559753, 0.8934466242790222, 0.7792485952377319, 0.8439145088195801, 0.9287611246109009, 0.9173269867897034, 0.8421087265014648, 0.9105963706970215, 0.9251580834388733, 0.8865901827812195, 0.8975049257278442, 0.9040325284004211, 0.598308265209198, 0.9156509637832642, 0.9219183325767517, 0.917572557926178, 0.9271485209465027, 0.7812216877937317, 0.934869110584259, 0.7963650822639465, 0.8957318067550659, 0.8774437308311462, 0.8936624526977539, 0.9042767286300659, 0.9175179600715637, 0.8847399950027466, 0.7992129921913147, 0.8887379169464111, 0.8680440187454224, 0.9163015484809875, 0.9069443345069885, 0.8428585529327393, 0.8612807393074036, 0.8736007809638977, 0.8503599762916565, 0.9303619861602783, 0.9230085015296936, 0.9124537110328674, 0.838311493396759, 0.9203614592552185, 0.7839168906211853, 0.892651379108429, 0.917584240436554, 0.8754274249076843, 0.9058083891868591, 0.8746927380561829, 0.9481506943702698, 0.819858968257904, 0.8532971739768982, 0.9348028302192688, 0.9011955857276917, 0.9128977656364441, 0.9020238518714905, 0.7965840697288513, 0.922857940196991, 0.8871424794197083, 0.957228422164917, 0.9462702870368958, 0.8932064175605774, 0.899246096611023, 0.7886218428611755, 0.9168829917907715, 0.835385799407959, 0.8156871795654297, 0.88618004322052, 0.9073708057403564, 0.9365527033805847, 0.929496169090271, 0.9255505204200745, 0.9068191051483154, 0.8667405247688293, 0.8864852786064148, 0.8846639394760132, 0.8660685420036316, 0.9128713011741638, 0.9587978720664978, 0.8845561742782593, 0.8572779297828674, 0.83245849609375, 0.9057099223136902, 0.8519901633262634, 0.9028526544570923, 0.8763790130615234, 0.9000537991523743, 0.8349939584732056, 0.8198042511940002, 0.9030904769897461, 0.8093129992485046, 0.9089750647544861, 0.8615365028381348, 0.8638841509819031, 0.6268337368965149, 0.912794828414917, 0.9138323664665222, 0.9126943945884705, 0.9014944434165955, 0.9314977526664734, 0.8615856766700745, 0.8747124671936035, 0.9044883847236633, 0.8770127892494202, 0.8869357109069824, 0.9677708745002747, 0.822730302810669, 0.8884615302085876, 0.8854060769081116, 0.8837963938713074, 0.8367701172828674, 0.8753893375396729, 0.8670292496681213, 0.8165760636329651, 0.9046326279640198, 0.8998434543609619, 0.7861019968986511, 0.8913170099258423, 0.8939683437347412, 0.8964720368385315, 0.832795262336731, 0.9171074032783508, 0.959461510181427, 0.9253107309341431, 0.8361487984657288, 0.850744366645813, 0.8403900265693665, 0.761131763458252, 0.8891382217407227, 0.9596100449562073, 0.9296215176582336, 0.8381044864654541, 0.8575015664100647, 0.9407198429107666, 0.9076250195503235, 0.905852735042572, 0.900056779384613, 0.8291108012199402, 0.8888034224510193, 0.8687364459037781, 0.9024360775947571, 0.8569546341896057, 0.7928773760795593, 0.8920158743858337, 0.8589311838150024, 0.9451358914375305, 0.9188082218170166, 0.9003178477287292, 0.8586506843566895, 0.9035122394561768, 0.8413276076316833, 0.8034417033195496, 0.9043282866477966, 0.7142931818962097, 0.8133304119110107, 0.799897313117981, 0.8845837712287903, 0.7694829106330872, 0.8632156848907471, 0.8828889727592468, 0.9097101092338562, 0.8957943916320801, 0.875360369682312, 0.7813114523887634, 0.8854539394378662, 0.8372407555580139, 0.9001232981681824, 0.9126424789428711, 0.9150516390800476, 0.5896556973457336, 0.9292682409286499, 0.9329655766487122, 0.9209365844726562, 0.874763011932373, 0.8063284158706665, 0.9059213995933533, 0.8782305121421814, 0.9144047498703003, 0.8683714270591736, 0.9366416931152344, 0.8953953385353088, 0.9183944463729858, 0.9085060954093933, 0.8494277596473694, 0.8820608854293823, 0.9109132885932922, 0.9067827463150024, 0.9329816699028015, 0.8127548098564148, 0.9237362742424011, 0.9010466933250427, 0.9244109392166138, 0.898463785648346, 0.6707475781440735, 0.927011251449585, 0.9246076345443726, 0.8652928471565247, 0.774091899394989, 0.8763971924781799, 0.9043610692024231, 0.8624444603919983, 0.8392846584320068, 0.8179023861885071, 0.8899998664855957, 0.9222691059112549, 0.9154064059257507, 0.8676052689552307, 0.8811234831809998, 0.9162783622741699, 0.8256129026412964, 0.8235218524932861, 0.9008933901786804, 0.7886406779289246, 0.9084872603416443, 0.8763032555580139, 0.825351893901825, 0.8668842911720276, 0.8969568610191345, 0.9539232850074768, 0.895141065120697, 0.8702589869499207, 0.9366866946220398, 0.9194467067718506, 0.8694969415664673, 0.910535991191864, 0.9098271727561951, 0.8351380228996277, 0.9299794435501099, 0.8888787031173706, 0.8370352387428284, 0.7021092772483826, 0.9021003842353821, 0.8911355137825012, 0.8827410340309143, 0.8857274651527405, 0.871383786201477, 0.8605039119720459, 0.9286988377571106, 0.8821320533752441, 0.9242957234382629, 0.8554366230964661, 0.5796411633491516, 0.8136312365531921, 0.8843205571174622, 0.8812400102615356, 0.9017168879508972, 0.9212473034858704, 0.921928346157074, 0.9168091416358948, 0.9075556993484497, 0.9642190337181091, 0.8885273337364197, 0.8765342831611633, 0.8565382957458496, 0.9127944111824036, 0.889857828617096, 0.9047601819038391, 0.8745830655097961, 0.9272984862327576, 0.7837652564048767, 0.8184810876846313, 0.8474910259246826, 0.8324310183525085, 0.8309289813041687, 0.891474187374115, 0.8854781985282898, 0.9402778744697571, 0.904171347618103, 0.9667567014694214, 0.7380396127700806, 0.8016777634620667, 0.9249946475028992, 0.9182882905006409, 0.9486115574836731, 0.7956828474998474, 0.9229510426521301, 0.8437548279762268, 0.8933274149894714, 0.8050554990768433, 0.9265081286430359, 0.8739355206489563, 0.8979608416557312, 0.9577544927597046, 0.874372661113739, 0.9413455128669739, 0.8662175536155701, 0.8701500296592712, 0.9043397307395935, 0.8565016984939575, 0.7778860926628113, 0.8831560015678406, 0.9035773873329163, 0.8618860840797424, 0.9366253614425659, 0.9152933955192566, 0.9051512479782104, 0.8954176306724548, 0.8702452778816223, 0.8286142349243164, 0.9305594563484192, 0.8305675387382507, 0.9135579466819763, 0.8893097043037415, 0.824772834777832, 0.8786758184432983, 0.9818360209465027, 0.9439951777458191, 0.8791455626487732, 0.8666882514953613, 0.9259606003761292, 0.7346084117889404, 0.8944268822669983, 0.8221175074577332, 0.9326160550117493, 0.8927947878837585, 0.7675862312316895, 0.9208083748817444, 0.8965296149253845, 0.9123629331588745, 0.9086249470710754, 0.891551673412323]}